International Program License Agreement

Part 1 - General Terms

BY DOWNLOADING, INSTALLING, COPYING, ACCESSING, CLICKING ON AN "ACCEPT" BUTTON, OR OTHERWISE USING THE PROGRAM, LICENSEE AGREES TO THE TERMS OF THIS AGREEMENT. IF YOU ARE ACCEPTING THESE TERMS ON BEHALF OF LICENSEE, YOU REPRESENT AND WARRANT THAT YOU HAVE FULL AUTHORITY TO BIND LICENSEE TO THESE TERMS. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS,

* DO NOT DOWNLOAD, INSTALL, COPY, ACCESS, CLICK ON AN "ACCEPT" BUTTON, OR USE THE PROGRAM; AND

* PROMPTLY RETURN THE UNUSED MEDIA, DOCUMENTATION, AND PROOF OF ENTITLEMENT TO THE PARTY FROM WHOM IT WAS OBTAINED FOR A REFUND OF THE AMOUNT PAID. IF THE PROGRAM WAS DOWNLOADED, DESTROY ALL COPIES OF THE PROGRAM.

1. Definitions

"Authorized Use" - the specified level at which Licensee is authorized to execute or run the Program. That level may be measured by number of users, millions of service units ("MSUs"), Processor Value Units ("PVUs"), or other level of use specified by IBM.

"IBM" - International Business Machines Corporation or one of its subsidiaries.

"License Information" ("LI") - a document that provides information and any additional terms specific to a Program. The Program's LI is available at www.ibm.com/software/sla. The LI can also be found in the Program's directory, by the use of a system command, or as a booklet included with the Program.

"Program" - the following, including the original and all whole or partial copies: 1) machine-readable instructions and data, 2) components, files, and modules, 3) audio-visual content (such as images, text, recordings, or pictures), and 4) related licensed materials (such as keys and documentation).

"Proof of Entitlement" ("PoE") - evidence of Licensee's Authorized Use. The PoE is also evidence of Licensee's eligibility for warranty, future update prices, if any, and potential special or promotional opportunities. If IBM does not provide Licensee with a PoE, then IBM may accept as the PoE the original paid sales receipt or other sales record from the party (either IBM or its reseller) from whom Licensee obtained the Program, provided that it specifies the Program name and Authorized Use obtained.

"Warranty Period" - one year, starting on the date the original Licensee is granted the license.

2. Agreement Structure

This Agreement includes Part 1 - General Terms, Part 2 - Country-unique Terms (if any), the LI, and the PoE and is the complete agreement between Licensee and IBM regarding the use of the Program. It replaces any prior oral or written communications between Licensee and IBM concerning Licensee's use of the Program. The terms of Part 2 may replace or modify those of Part 1. To the extent of any conflict, the LI prevails over both Parts.

3. License Grant

The Program is owned by IBM or an IBM supplier, and is copyrighted and licensed, not sold.

IBM grants Licensee a nonexclusive license to 1) use the Program up to the Authorized Use specified in the PoE, 2) make and install copies to support such Authorized Use, and 3) make a backup copy, all provided that

a. Licensee has lawfully obtained the Program and complies with the terms of this Agreement;

b. the backup copy does not execute unless the backed-up Program cannot execute;

c. Licensee reproduces all copyright notices and other legends of ownership on each copy, or partial copy, of the Program;

d. Licensee ensures that anyone who uses the Program (accessed either locally or remotely) 1) does so only on Licensee's behalf and 2) complies with the terms of this Agreement;

e. Licensee does not 1) use, copy, modify, or distribute the Program except as expressly permitted in this Agreement; 2) reverse assemble, reverse compile, otherwise translate, or reverse engineer the Program, except as expressly permitted by law without the possibility of contractual waiver; 3) use any of the Program's components, files, modules, audio-visual content, or related licensed materials separately from that Program; or 4) sublicense, rent, or lease the Program; and

f. if Licensee obtains this Program as a Supporting Program, Licensee uses this Program only to support the Principal Program and subject to any limitations in the license to the Principal Program, or, if Licensee obtains this Program as a Principal Program, Licensee uses all Supporting Programs only to support this Program, and subject to any limitations in this Agreement. For purposes of this Item "f," a "Supporting Program" is a Program that is part of another IBM Program ("Principal Program") and identified as a Supporting Program in the Principal Program's LI. (To obtain a separate license to a Supporting Program without these restrictions, Licensee should contact the party from whom Licensee obtained the Supporting Program.)

This license applies to each copy of the Program that Licensee makes.

3.1 Trade-ups, Updates, Fixes, and Patches

3.1.1 Trade-ups

If the Program is replaced by a trade-up Program, the replaced Program's license is promptly terminated.

3.1.2 Updates, Fixes, and Patches

When Licensee receives an update, fix, or patch to a Program, Licensee accepts any additional or different terms that are applicable to such update, fix, or patch that are specified in its LI. If no additional or different terms are provided, then the update, fix, or patch is subject solely to this Agreement. If the Program is replaced by an update, Licensee agrees to promptly discontinue use of the replaced Program.

3.2 Fixed Term Licenses

If IBM licenses the Program for a fixed term, Licensee's license is terminated at the end of the fixed term, unless Licensee and IBM agree to renew it.

3.3 Term and Termination

This Agreement is effective until terminated.

IBM may terminate Licensee's license if Licensee fails to comply with the terms of this Agreement.

If the license is terminated for any reason by either party, Licensee agrees to promptly discontinue use of and destroy all of Licensee's copies of the Program. Any terms of this Agreement that by their nature extend beyond termination of this Agreement remain in effect until fulfilled, and apply to both parties' respective successors and assignees.

4. Charges

Charges are based on Authorized Use obtained, which is specified in the PoE. IBM does not give credits or refunds for charges already due or paid, except as specified elsewhere in this Agreement.

If Licensee wishes to increase its Authorized Use, Licensee must notify IBM or an authorized IBM reseller in advance and pay any applicable charges.

5. Taxes

If any authority imposes on the Program a duty, tax, levy, or fee, excluding those based on IBM's net income, then Licensee agrees to pay that amount, as specified in an invoice, or supply exemption documentation. Licensee is responsible for any personal property taxes for the Program from the date that Licensee obtains it. If any authority imposes a customs duty, tax, levy, or fee for the import into or the export, transfer, access, or use of the Program outside the country in which the original Licensee was granted the license, then Licensee agrees that it is responsible for, and will pay, any amount imposed.

6. Money-back Guarantee

If Licensee is dissatisfied with the Program for any reason and is the original Licensee, Licensee may terminate the license and obtain a refund of the amount Licensee paid for the Program, provided that Licensee returns the Program and PoE to the party from whom Licensee obtained it within 30 days of the date the PoE was issued to Licensee. If the license is for a fixed term that is subject to renewal, then Licensee may obtain a refund only if the Program and its PoE are returned within the first 30 days of the initial term. If Licensee downloaded the Program, Licensee should contact the party from whom Licensee obtained it for instructions on how to obtain the refund.

7. Program Transfer

Licensee may transfer the Program and all of Licensee's license rights and obligations to another party only if that party agrees to the terms of this Agreement. If the license is terminated for any reason by either party, Licensee is prohibited from transferring the Program to another party. Licensee may not transfer a portion of 1) the Program or 2) the Program's Authorized Use. When Licensee transfers the Program, Licensee must also transfer a hard copy of this Agreement, including the LI and PoE. Immediately after the transfer, Licensee's license terminates.

8. Warranty and Exclusions

8.1 Limited Warranty

IBM warrants that the Program, when used in its specified operating environment, will conform to its specifications. The Program's specifications, and specified operating environment information, can be found in documentation accompanying the Program (such as a read-me file) or other information published by IBM (such as an announcement letter). Licensee agrees that such documentation and other Program content may be supplied only in the English language, unless otherwise required by local law without the possibility of contractual waiver or limitation.

The warranty applies only to the unmodified portion of the Program. IBM does not warrant uninterrupted or error-free operation of the Program, or that IBM will correct all Program defects. Licensee is responsible for the results obtained from the use of the Program.

During the Warranty Period, IBM provides Licensee with access to IBM databases containing information on known Program defects, defect corrections, restrictions, and bypasses at no additional charge. Consult the IBM Software Support Handbook for further information at www.ibm.com/software/support.

If the Program does not function as warranted during the Warranty Period and the problem cannot be resolved with information available in the IBM databases, Licensee may return the Program and its PoE to the party (either IBM or its reseller) from whom Licensee obtained it and receive a refund of the amount Licensee paid. After returning the Program, Licensee's license terminates. If Licensee downloaded the Program, Licensee should contact the party from whom Licensee obtained it for instructions on how to obtain the refund.

8.2 Exclusions

THESE WARRANTIES ARE LICENSEE'S EXCLUSIVE WARRANTIES AND REPLACE ALL OTHER WARRANTIES OR CONDITIONS, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES OR CONDITIONS OF MERCHANTABILITY, SATISFACTORY QUALITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE, AND ANY WARRANTY OR CONDITION OF NON-INFRINGEMENT. SOME STATES OR JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, SO THE ABOVE EXCLUSION MAY NOT APPLY TO LICENSEE. IN THAT EVENT, SUCH WARRANTIES ARE LIMITED IN DURATION TO THE WARRANTY PERIOD. NO WARRANTIES APPLY AFTER THAT PERIOD. SOME STATES OR JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW LIMITATIONS ON HOW LONG AN IMPLIED WARRANTY LASTS, SO THE ABOVE LIMITATION MAY NOT APPLY TO LICENSEE.

THESE WARRANTIES GIVE LICENSEE SPECIFIC LEGAL RIGHTS. LICENSEE MAY ALSO HAVE OTHER RIGHTS THAT VARY FROM STATE TO STATE OR JURISDICTION TO JURISDICTION.

THE WARRANTIES IN THIS SECTION 8 (WARRANTY AND EXCLUSIONS) ARE PROVIDED SOLELY BY IBM. THE DISCLAIMERS IN THIS SUBSECTION 8.2 (EXCLUSIONS), HOWEVER, ALSO APPLY TO IBM'S SUPPLIERS OF THIRD PARTY CODE. THOSE SUPPLIERS PROVIDE SUCH CODE WITHOUT WARRANTIES OR CONDITION OF ANY KIND. THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT NULLIFY IBM'S WARRANTY OBLIGATIONS UNDER THIS AGREEMENT.

9. Licensee Data and Databases

To assist Licensee in isolating the cause of a problem with the Program, IBM may request that Licensee 1) allow IBM to remotely access Licensee's system or 2) send Licensee information or system data to IBM. However, IBM is not obligated to provide such assistance unless IBM and Licensee enter a separate written agreement under which IBM agrees to provide to Licensee that type of support, which is beyond IBM's warranty obligations in this Agreement. In any event, IBM uses information about errors and problems to improve its products and services, and assist with its provision of related support offerings. For these purposes, IBM may use IBM entities and subcontractors (including in one or more countries other than the one in which Licensee is located), and Licensee authorizes IBM to do so.

Licensee remains responsible for 1) any data and the content of any database Licensee makes available to IBM, 2) the selection and implementation of procedures and controls regarding access, security, encryption, use, and transmission of data (including any personally-identifiable data), and 3) backup and recovery of any database and any stored data. Licensee will not send or provide IBM access to any personally-identifiable information, whether in data or any other form, and will be responsible for reasonable costs and other amounts that IBM may incur relating to any such information mistakenly provided to IBM or the loss or disclosure of such information by IBM, including those arising out of any third party claims.

10. Limitation of Liability

The limitations and exclusions in this Section 10 (Limitation of Liability) apply to the full extent they are not prohibited by applicable law without the possibility of contractual waiver.

10.1 Items for Which IBM May Be Liable

Circumstances may arise where, because of a default on IBM's part or other liability, Licensee is entitled to recover damages from IBM. Regardless of the basis on which Licensee is entitled to claim damages from IBM (including fundamental breach, negligence, misrepresentation, or other contract or tort claim), IBM's entire liability for all claims in the aggregate arising from or related to each Program or otherwise arising under this Agreement will not exceed the amount of any 1) damages for bodily injury (including death) and damage to real property and tangible personal property and 2) other actual direct damages up to the charges (if the Program is subject to fixed term charges, up to twelve months' charges) Licensee paid for the Program that is the subject of the claim.

This limit also applies to any of IBM's Program developers and suppliers. It is the maximum for which IBM and its Program developers and suppliers are collectively responsible.

10.2 Items for Which IBM Is Not Liable

UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES IS IBM, ITS PROGRAM DEVELOPERS OR SUPPLIERS LIABLE FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING, EVEN IF INFORMED OF THEIR POSSIBILITY:

a. LOSS OF, OR DAMAGE TO, DATA;

b. SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, EXEMPLARY, OR INDIRECT DAMAGES, OR FOR ANY ECONOMIC CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES; OR

c. LOST PROFITS, BUSINESS, REVENUE, GOODWILL, OR ANTICIPATED SAVINGS.

11. Compliance Verification

For purposes of this Section 11 (Compliance Verification), "IPLA Program Terms" means 1) this Agreement and applicable amendments and transaction documents provided by IBM, and 2) IBM software policies that may be found at the IBM Software Policy website (www.ibm.com/softwarepolicies), including but not limited to those policies concerning backup, sub-capacity pricing, and migration.

The rights and obligations set forth in this Section 11 remain in effect during the period the Program is licensed to Licensee, and for two years thereafter.

11.1 Verification Process

Licensee agrees to create, retain, and provide to IBM and its auditors accurate written records, system tool outputs, and other system information sufficient to provide auditable verification that Licensee's use of all Programs is in compliance with the IPLA Program Terms, including, without limitation, all of IBM's applicable licensing and pricing qualification terms. Licensee is responsible for 1) ensuring that it does not exceed its Authorized Use, and 2) remaining in compliance with IPLA Program Terms.

Upon reasonable notice, IBM may verify Licensee's compliance with IPLA Program Terms at all sites and for all environments in which Licensee uses (for any purpose) Programs subject to IPLA Program Terms. Such verification will be conducted in a manner that minimizes disruption to Licensee's business, and may be conducted on Licensee's premises, during normal business hours. IBM may use an independent auditor to assist with such verification, provided IBM has a written confidentiality agreement in place with such auditor.

11.2 Resolution

IBM will notify Licensee in writing if any such verification indicates that Licensee has used any Program in excess of its Authorized Use or is otherwise not in compliance with the IPLA Program Terms. Licensee agrees to promptly pay directly to IBM the charges that IBM specifies in an invoice for 1) any such excess use, 2) support for such excess use for the lesser of the duration of such excess use or two years, and 3) any additional charges and other liabilities determined as a result of such verification.

12. Third Party Notices

The Program may include third party code that IBM, not the third party, licenses to Licensee under this Agreement. Notices, if any, for the third party code ("Third Party Notices") are included for Licensee's information only. These notices can be found in the Program's NOTICES file(s). Information on how to obtain source code for certain third party code can be found in the Third Party Notices. If in the Third Party Notices IBM identifies third party code as "Modifiable Third Party Code," IBM authorizes Licensee to 1) modify the Modifiable Third Party Code and 2) reverse engineer the Program modules that directly interface with the Modifiable Third Party Code provided that it is only for the purpose of debugging Licensee's modifications to such third party code. IBM's service and support obligations, if any, apply only to the unmodified Program.

13. General

a. Nothing in this Agreement affects any statutory rights of consumers that cannot be waived or limited by contract.

b. For Programs IBM provides to Licensee in tangible form, IBM fulfills its shipping and delivery obligations upon the delivery of such Programs to the IBM-designated carrier, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by Licensee and IBM.

c. If any provision of this Agreement is held to be invalid or unenforceable, the remaining provisions of this Agreement remain in full force and effect.

d. Licensee agrees to comply with all applicable export and import laws and regulations, including U.S. embargo and sanctions regulations and prohibitions on export for certain end uses or to certain users.

e. Licensee authorizes International Business Machines Corporation and its subsidiaries (and their successors and assigns, contractors and IBM Business Partners) to store and use Licensee's business contact information wherever they do business, in connection with IBM products and services, or in furtherance of IBM's business relationship with Licensee.

f. Each party will allow the other reasonable opportunity to comply before it claims that the other has not met its obligations under this Agreement. The parties will attempt in good faith to resolve all disputes, disagreements, or claims between the parties relating to this Agreement.

g. Unless otherwise required by applicable law without the possibility of contractual waiver or limitation: 1) neither party will bring a legal action, regardless of form, for any claim arising out of or related to this Agreement more than two years after the cause of action arose; and 2) upon the expiration of such time limit, any such claim and all respective rights related to the claim lapse.

h. Neither Licensee nor IBM is responsible for failure to fulfill any obligations due to causes beyond its control.

i. No right or cause of action for any third party is created by this Agreement, nor is IBM responsible for any third party claims against Licensee, except as permitted in Subsection 10.1 (Items for Which IBM May Be Liable) above for bodily injury (including death) or damage to real or tangible personal property for which IBM is legally liable to that third party.

j. In entering into this Agreement, neither party is relying on any representation not specified in this Agreement, including but not limited to any representation concerning: 1) the performance or function of the Program, other than as expressly warranted in Section 8 (Warranty and Exclusions) above; 2) the experiences or recommendations of other parties; or 3) any results or savings that Licensee may achieve.

k. IBM has signed agreements with certain organizations (called "IBM Business Partners") to promote, market, and support certain Programs. IBM Business Partners remain independent and separate from IBM. IBM is not responsible for the actions or statements of IBM Business Partners or obligations they have to Licensee.

l. The license and intellectual property indemnification terms of Licensee's other agreements with IBM (such as the IBM Customer Agreement) do not apply to Program licenses granted under this Agreement.

14. Geographic Scope and Governing Law

14.1 Governing Law

Both parties agree to the application of the laws of the country in which Licensee obtained the Program license to govern, interpret, and enforce all of Licensee's and IBM's respective rights, duties, and obligations arising from, or relating in any manner to, the subject matter of this Agreement, without regard to conflict of law principles.

The United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods does not apply.

14.2 Jurisdiction

All rights, duties, and obligations are subject to the courts of the country in which Licensee obtained the Program license.

Part 2 - Country-unique Terms

For licenses granted in the countries specified below, the following terms replace or modify the referenced terms in Part 1. All terms in Part 1 that are not changed by these amendments remain unchanged and in effect. This Part 2 is organized as follows:

* Multiple country amendments to Part 1, Section 14 (Governing Law and Jurisdiction);

* Americas country amendments to other Agreement terms;

* Asia Pacific country amendments to other Agreement terms; and

* Europe, Middle East, and Africa country amendments to other Agreement terms.

Multiple country amendments to Part 1, Section 14 (Governing Law and Jurisdiction)

14.1 Governing Law

The phrase "the laws of the country in which Licensee obtained the Program license" in the first paragraph of 14.1 Governing Law is replaced by the following phrases in the countries below:

AMERICAS

(1) In Canada: the laws in the Province of Ontario;

(2) in Mexico: the federal laws of the Republic of Mexico;

(3) in the United States, Anguilla, Antigua/Barbuda, Aruba, British Virgin Islands, Cayman Islands, Dominica, Grenada, Guyana, Saint Kitts and Nevis, Saint Lucia, Saint Maarten, and Saint Vincent and the Grenadines: the laws of the State of New York, United States;

(4) in Venezuela: the laws of the Bolivarian Republic of Venezuela;

ASIA PACIFIC

(5) in Cambodia and Laos: the laws of the State of New York, United States;

(6) in Australia: the laws of the State or Territory in which the transaction is performed;

(7) in Hong Kong SAR and Macau SAR: the laws of Hong Kong Special Administrative Region ("SAR");

(8) in Taiwan: the laws of Taiwan;

EUROPE, MIDDLE EAST, AND AFRICA

(9) in Albania, Armenia, Azerbaijan, Belarus, Bosnia-Herzegovina, Bulgaria, Croatia, Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, Georgia, Hungary, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Moldova, Montenegro, Poland, Romania, Russia, Serbia, Slovakia, Tajikistan, Turkmenistan, Ukraine, and Uzbekistan: the laws of Austria;

(10) in Algeria, Andorra, Benin, Burkina Faso, Cameroon, Cape Verde, Central African Republic, Chad, Comoros, Congo Republic, Djibouti, Democratic Republic of Congo, Equatorial Guinea, French Guiana, French Polynesia, Gabon, Gambia, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Ivory Coast, Lebanon, Madagascar, Mali, Mauritania, Mauritius, Mayotte, Morocco, New Caledonia, Niger, Reunion, Senegal, Seychelles, Togo, Tunisia, Vanuatu, and Wallis and Futuna: the laws of France;

(11) in Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania: the laws of Finland;

(12) in Angola, Bahrain, Botswana, Burundi, Egypt, Eritrea, Ethiopia, Ghana, Jordan, Kenya, Kuwait, Liberia, Malawi, Malta, Mozambique, Nigeria, Oman, Pakistan, Qatar, Rwanda, Sao Tome and Principe, Saudi Arabia, Sierra Leone, Somalia, Tanzania, Uganda, United Arab Emirates, the United Kingdom, West Bank/Gaza, Yemen, Zambia, and Zimbabwe: the laws of England; and

(13) in South Africa, Namibia, Lesotho, and Swaziland: the laws of the Republic of South Africa.

14.2 Jurisdiction

The following paragraph pertains to jurisdiction and replaces Subsection 14.2 (Jurisdiction) as it applies for those countries identified below:

All rights, duties, and obligations are subject to the courts of the country in which Licensee obtained the Program license except that in the countries identified below all disputes arising out of or related to this Agreement, including summary proceedings, will be brought before and subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the following courts of competent jurisdiction:

AMERICAS

(1) In Argentina: the Ordinary Commercial Court of the city of Buenos Aires;

(2) in Brazil: the court of Rio de Janeiro, RJ;

(3) in Chile: the Civil Courts of Justice of Santiago;

(4) in Ecuador: the civil judges of Quito for executory or summary proceedings (as applicable);

(5) in Mexico: the courts located in Mexico City, Federal District;

(6) in Peru: the judges and tribunals of the judicial district of Lima, Cercado;

(7) in Uruguay: the courts of the city of Montevideo;

(8) in Venezuela: the courts of the metropolitan area of the city of Caracas;

EUROPE, MIDDLE EAST, AND AFRICA

(9) in Austria: the court of law in Vienna, Austria (Inner-City);

(10) in Algeria, Andorra, Benin, Burkina Faso, Cameroon, Cape Verde, Central African Republic, Chad, Comoros, Congo Republic, Djibouti, Democratic Republic of Congo, Equatorial Guinea, France, French Guiana, French Polynesia, Gabon, Gambia, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Ivory Coast, Lebanon, Madagascar, Mali, Mauritania, Mauritius, Mayotte, Monaco, Morocco, New Caledonia, Niger, Reunion, Senegal, Seychelles, Togo, Tunisia, Vanuatu, and Wallis and Futuna: the Commercial Court of Paris;

(11) in Angola, Bahrain, Botswana, Burundi, Egypt, Eritrea, Ethiopia, Ghana, Jordan, Kenya, Kuwait, Liberia, Malawi, Malta, Mozambique, Nigeria, Oman, Pakistan, Qatar, Rwanda, Sao Tome and Principe, Saudi Arabia, Sierra Leone, Somalia, Tanzania, Uganda, United Arab Emirates, the United Kingdom, West Bank/Gaza, Yemen, Zambia, and Zimbabwe: the English courts;

(12) in South Africa, Namibia, Lesotho, and Swaziland: the High Court in Johannesburg;

(13) in Greece: the competent court of Athens;

(14) in Israel: the courts of Tel Aviv-Jaffa;

(15) in Italy: the courts of Milan;

(16) in Portugal: the courts of Lisbon;

(17) in Spain: the courts of Madrid; and

(18) in Turkey: the Istanbul Central Courts and Execution Directorates of Istanbul, the Republic of Turkey.

14.3 Arbitration

The following paragraph is added as a new Subsection 14.3 (Arbitration) as it applies for those countries identified below. The provisions of this Subsection 14.3 prevail over those of Subsection 14.2 (Jurisdiction) to the extent permitted by the applicable governing law and rules of procedure:

ASIA PACIFIC

(1) In Cambodia, India, Laos, Philippines, and Vietnam:

Disputes arising out of or in connection with this Agreement will be finally settled by arbitration which will be held in Singapore in accordance with the Arbitration Rules of Singapore International Arbitration Center ("SIAC Rules") then in effect. The arbitration award will be final and binding for the parties without appeal and will be in writing and set forth the findings of fact and the conclusions of law.

The number of arbitrators will be three, with each side to the dispute being entitled to appoint one arbitrator. The two arbitrators appointed by the parties will appoint a third arbitrator who will act as chairman of the proceedings. Vacancies in the post of chairman will be filled by the president of the SIAC. Other vacancies will be filled by the respective nominating party. Proceedings will continue from the stage they were at when the vacancy occurred.

If one of the parties refuses or otherwise fails to appoint an arbitrator within 30 days of the date the other party appoints its, the first appointed arbitrator will be the sole arbitrator, provided that the arbitrator was validly and properly appointed.

All proceedings will be conducted, including all documents presented in such proceedings, in the English language. The English language version of this Agreement prevails over any other language version.

(2) In the People's Republic of China:

In case no settlement can be reached, the disputes will be submitted to China International Economic and Trade Arbitration Commission for arbitration according to the then effective rules of the said Arbitration Commission. The arbitration will take place in Beijing and be conducted in Chinese. The arbitration award will be final and binding on both parties. During the course of arbitration, this agreement will continue to be performed except for the part which the parties are disputing and which is undergoing arbitration.

(3) In Indonesia:

Each party will allow the other reasonable opportunity to comply before it claims that the other has not met its obligations under this Agreement. The parties will attempt in good faith to resolve all disputes, disagreements, or claims between the parties relating to this Agreement. Unless otherwise required by applicable law without the possibility of contractual waiver or limitation, i) neither party will bring a legal action, regardless of form, arising out of or related to this Agreement or any transaction under it more than two years after the cause of action arose; and ii) after such time limit, any legal action arising out of this Agreement or any transaction under it and all respective rights related to any such action lapse.

Disputes arising out of or in connection with this Agreement shall be finally settled by arbitration that shall be held in Jakarta, Indonesia in accordance with the rules of Board of the Indonesian National Board of Arbitration (Badan Arbitrase Nasional Indonesia or "BANI") then in effect. The arbitration award shall be final and binding for the parties without appeal and shall be in writing and set forth the findings of fact and the conclusions of law.

The number of arbitrators shall be three, with each side to the dispute being entitled to appoint one arbitrator. The two arbitrators appointed by the parties shall appoint a third arbitrator who shall act as chairman of the proceedings. Vacancies in the post of chairman shall be filled by the chairman of the BANI. Other vacancies shall be filled by the respective nominating party. Proceedings shall continue from the stage they were at when the vacancy occurred.

If one of the parties refuses or otherwise fails to appoint an arbitrator within 30 days of the date the other party appoints its, the first appointed arbitrator shall be the sole arbitrator, provided that the arbitrator was validly and properly appointed.

All proceedings shall be conducted, including all documents presented in such proceedings, in the English and/or Indonesian language.

EUROPE, MIDDLE EAST, AND AFRICA

(4) In Albania, Armenia, Azerbaijan, Belarus, Bosnia-Herzegovina, Bulgaria, Croatia, Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, Georgia, Hungary, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Moldova, Montenegro, Poland, Romania, Russia, Serbia, Slovakia, Tajikistan, Turkmenistan, Ukraine, and Uzbekistan:

All disputes arising out of this Agreement or related to its violation, termination or nullity will be finally settled under the Rules of Arbitration and Conciliation of the International Arbitral Center of the Federal Economic Chamber in Vienna (Vienna Rules) by three arbitrators appointed in accordance with these rules. The arbitration will be held in Vienna, Austria, and the official language of the proceedings will be English. The decision of the arbitrators will be final and binding upon both parties. Therefore, pursuant to paragraph 598 (2) of the Austrian Code of Civil Procedure, the parties expressly waive the application of paragraph 595 (1) figure 7 of the Code. IBM may, however, institute proceedings in a competent court in the country of installation.

(5) In Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania:

All disputes arising in connection with this Agreement will be finally settled in arbitration that will be held in Helsinki, Finland in accordance with the arbitration laws of Finland then in effect. Each party will appoint one arbitrator. The arbitrators will then jointly appoint the chairman. If arbitrators cannot agree on the chairman, then the Central Chamber of Commerce in Helsinki will appoint the chairman.

AMERICAS COUNTRY AMENDMENTS

CANADA

10.1 Items for Which IBM May be Liable

The following replaces Item 1 in the first paragraph of this Subsection 10.1 (Items for Which IBM May be Liable):

1) damages for bodily injury (including death) and physical harm to real property and tangible personal property caused by IBM's negligence; and

13. General

The following replaces Item 13.d:

d. Licensee agrees to comply with all applicable export and import laws and regulations, including those of that apply to goods of United States origin and that prohibit or limit export for certain uses or to certain users.

The following replaces Item 13.i:

i. No right or cause of action for any third party is created by this Agreement or any transaction under it, nor is IBM responsible for any third party claims against Licensee except as permitted by the Limitation of Liability section above for bodily injury (including death) or physical harm to real or tangible personal property caused by IBM's negligence for which IBM is legally liable to that third party.

The following is added as Item 13.m:

m. For purposes of this Item 13.m, "Personal Data" refers to information relating to an identified or identifiable individual made available by one of the parties, its personnel or any other individual to the other in connection with this Agreement. The following provisions apply in the event that one party makes Personal Data available to the other:

(1) General

(a) Each party is responsible for complying with any obligations applying to it under applicable Canadian data privacy laws and regulations ("Laws").

(b) Neither party will request Personal Data beyond what is necessary to fulfill the purpose(s) for which it is requested. The purpose(s) for requesting Personal Data must be reasonable. Each party will agree in advance as to the type of Personal Data that is required to be made available.

(2) Security Safeguards

(a) Each party acknowledges that it is solely responsible for determining and communicating to the other the appropriate technological, physical and organizational security measures required to protect Personal Data.

(b) Each party will ensure that Personal Data is protected in accordance with the security safeguards communicated and agreed to by the other.

(c) Each party will ensure that any third party to whom Personal Data is transferred is bound by the applicable terms of this section.

(d) Additional or different services required to comply with the Laws will be deemed a request for new services.

(3) Use

Each party agrees that Personal Data will only be used, accessed, managed, transferred, disclosed to third parties or otherwise processed to fulfill the purpose(s) for which it was made available.

(4) Access Requests

(a) Each party agrees to reasonably cooperate with the other in connection with requests to access or amend Personal Data.

(b) Each party agrees to reimburse the other for any reasonable charges incurred in providing each other assistance.

(c) Each party agrees to amend Personal Data only upon receiving instructions to do so from the other party or its personnel.

(5) Retention

Each party will promptly return to the other or destroy all Personal Data that is no longer necessary to fulfill the purpose(s) for which it was made available, unless otherwise instructed by the other or its personnel or required by law.

(6) Public Bodies Who Are Subject to Public Sector Privacy Legislation

For Licensees who are public bodies subject to public sector privacy legislation, this Item 13.m applies only to Personal Data made available to Licensee in connection with this Agreement, and the obligations in this section apply only to Licensee, except that: 1) section (2)(a) applies only to IBM; 2) sections (1)(a) and (4)(a) apply to both parties; and 3) section (4)(b) and the last sentence in (1)(b) do not apply.

PERU

10. Limitation of Liability

The following is added to the end of this Section 10 (Limitation of Liability):

Except as expressly required by law without the possibility of contractual waiver, Licensee and IBM intend that the limitation of liability in this Limitation of Liability section applies to damages caused by all types of claims and causes of action. If any limitation on or exclusion from liability in this section is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unenforceable with respect to a particular claim or cause of action, the parties intend that it nonetheless apply to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law to all other claims and causes of action.

10.1 Items for Which IBM May be Liable

The following is added at the end of this Subsection 10.1:

In accordance with Article 1328 of the Peruvian Civil Code, the limitations and exclusions specified in this section will not apply to damages caused by IBM's willful misconduct ("dolo") or gross negligence ("culpa inexcusable").

UNITED STATES OF AMERICA

5. Taxes

The following is added at the end of this Section 5 (Taxes)

For Programs delivered electronically in the United States for which Licensee claims a state sales and use tax exemption, Licensee agrees not to receive any tangible personal property (e.g., media and publications) associated with the electronic program.

Licensee agrees to be responsible for any sales and use tax liabilities that may arise as a result of Licensee's subsequent redistribution of Programs after delivery by IBM.

13. General

The following is added to Section 13 as Item 13.m:

U.S. Government Users Restricted Rights - Use, duplication or disclosure is restricted by the GSA IT Schedule 70 Contract with the IBM Corporation.

The following is added to Item 13.f:

Each party waives any right to a jury trial in any proceeding arising out of or related to this Agreement.

ASIA PACIFIC COUNTRY AMENDMENTS

AUSTRALIA

5. Taxes

The following sentences replace the first two sentences of Section 5 (Taxes):

If any government or authority imposes a duty, tax (other than income tax), levy, or fee, on this Agreement or on the Program itself, that is not otherwise provided for in the amount payable, Licensee agrees to pay it when IBM invoices Licensee. If the rate of GST changes, IBM may adjust the charge or other amount payable to take into account that change from the date the change becomes effective.

8.1 Limited Warranty

The following is added to Subsection 8.1 (Limited Warranty):

The warranties specified this Section are in addition to any rights Licensee may have under the Competition and Consumer Act 2010 or other legislation and are only limited to the extent permitted by the applicable legislation.

10.1 Items for Which IBM May be Liable

The following is added to Subsection 10.1 (Items for Which IBM May be Liable):

Where IBM is in breach of a condition or warranty implied by the Competition and Consumer Act 2010, IBM's liability is limited to the repair or replacement of the goods, or the supply of equivalent goods. Where that condition or warranty relates to right to sell, quiet possession or clear title, or the goods are of a kind ordinarily obtained for personal, domestic or household use or consumption, then none of the limitations in this paragraph apply.

HONG KONG SAR, MACAU SAR, AND TAIWAN

As applies to licenses obtained in Taiwan and the special administrative regions, phrases throughout this Agreement containing the word "country" (for example, "the country in which the original Licensee was granted the license" and "the country in which Licensee obtained the Program license") are replaced with the following:

(1) In Hong Kong SAR: "Hong Kong SAR"

(2) In Macau SAR: "Macau SAR" except in the Governing Law clause (Section 14.1)

(3) In Taiwan: "Taiwan."

INDIA

10.1 Items for Which IBM May be Liable

The following replaces the terms of Items 1 and 2 of the first paragraph:

1) liability for bodily injury (including death) or damage to real property and tangible personal property will be limited to that caused by IBM's negligence; and 2) as to any other actual damage arising in any situation involving nonperformance by IBM pursuant to, or in any way related to the subject of this Agreement, IBM's liability will be limited to the charge paid by Licensee for the individual Program that is the subject of the claim.

13. General

The following replaces the terms of Item 13.g:

If no suit or other legal action is brought, within three years after the cause of action arose, in respect of any claim that either party may have against the other, the rights of the concerned party in respect of such claim will be forfeited and the other party will stand released from its obligations in respect of such claim.

INDONESIA

3.3 Term and Termination

The following is added to the last paragraph:

Both parties waive the provision of article 1266 of the Indonesian Civil Code, to the extent the article provision requires such court decree for the termination of an agreement creating mutual obligations.

JAPAN

13. General

The following is inserted after Item 13.f:

Any doubts concerning this Agreement will be initially resolved between us in good faith and in accordance with the principle of mutual trust.

MALAYSIA

10.2 Items for Which IBM Is not Liable

The word "SPECIAL" in Item 10.2b is deleted.

NEW ZEALAND

8.1 Limited Warranty

The following is added:

The warranties specified in this Section are in addition to any rights Licensee may have under the Consumer Guarantees Act 1993 or other legislation which cannot be excluded or limited. The Consumer Guarantees Act 1993 will not apply in respect of any goods which IBM provides, if Licensee requires the goods for the purposes of a business as defined in that Act.

10. Limitation of Liability

The following is added:

Where Programs are not obtained for the purposes of a business as defined in the Consumer Guarantees Act 1993, the limitations in this Section are subject to the limitations in that Act.

PEOPLE'S REPUBLIC OF CHINA

4. Charges

The following is added:

All banking charges incurred in the People's Republic of China will be borne by Licensee and those incurred outside the People's Republic of China will be borne by IBM.

PHILIPPINES

10.2 Items for Which IBM Is not Liable

The following replaces the terms of Item 10.2b:

b. special (including nominal and exemplary damages), moral, incidental, or indirect damages or for any economic consequential damages; or

SINGAPORE

10.2 Items for Which IBM Is not Liable

The words "SPECIAL" and "ECONOMIC" are deleted from Item 10.2b.

13. General

The following replaces the terms of Item 13.i:

Subject to the rights provided to IBM's suppliers and Program developers as provided in Section 10 above (Limitation of Liability), a person who is not a party to this Agreement will have no right under the Contracts (Right of Third Parties) Act to enforce any of its terms.

TAIWAN

8.1 Limited Warranty

The last paragraph is deleted.

10.1 Items for Which IBM May Be Liable

The following sentences are deleted:

This limit also applies to any of IBM's subcontractors and Program developers. It is the maximum for which IBM and its subcontractors and Program developers are collectively responsible.

EUROPE, MIDDLE EAST, AFRICA (EMEA) COUNTRY AMENDMENTS

EUROPEAN UNION MEMBER STATES

8. Warranty and Exclusions

The following is added to Section 8 (Warranty and Exclusion):

In the European Union ("EU"), consumers have legal rights under applicable national legislation governing the sale of consumer goods. Such rights are not affected by the provisions set out in this Section 8 (Warranty and Exclusions). The territorial scope of the Limited Warranty is worldwide.

EU MEMBER STATES AND THE COUNTRIES IDENTIFIED BELOW

Iceland, Liechtenstein, Norway, Switzerland, Turkey, and any other European country that has enacted local data privacy or protection legislation similar to the EU model.

13. General

The following replaces Item 13.e:

(1) Definitions - For the purposes of this Item 13.e, the following additional definitions apply:

(a) Business Contact Information - business-related contact information disclosed by Licensee to IBM, including names, job titles, business addresses, telephone numbers and email addresses of Licensee's employees and contractors. For Austria, Italy and Switzerland, Business Contact Information also includes information about Licensee and its contractors as legal entities (for example, Licensee's revenue data and other transactional information)

(b) Business Contact Personnel - Licensee employees and contractors to whom the Business Contact Information relates.

(c) Data Protection Authority - the authority established by the Data Protection and Electronic Communications Legislation in the applicable country or, for non-EU countries, the authority responsible for supervising the protection of personal data in that country, or (for any of the foregoing) any duly appointed successor entity thereto.

(d) Data Protection & Electronic Communications Legislation - (i) the applicable local legislation and regulations in force implementing the requirements of EU Directive 95/46/EC (on the protection of individuals with regard to the processing of personal data and on the free movement of such data) and of EU Directive 2002/58/EC (concerning the processing of personal data and the protection of privacy in the electronic communications sector); or (ii) for non-EU countries, the legislation and/or regulations passed in the applicable country relating to the protection of personal data and the regulation of electronic communications involving personal data, including (for any of the foregoing) any statutory replacement or modification thereof.

(e) IBM Group - International Business Machines Corporation of Armonk, New York, USA, its subsidiaries, and their respective Business Partners and subcontractors.

(2) Licensee authorizes IBM:

(a) to process and use Business Contact Information within IBM Group in support of Licensee including the provision of support services, and for the purpose of furthering the business relationship between Licensee and IBM Group, including, without limitation, contacting Business Contact Personnel (by email or otherwise) and marketing IBM Group products and services (the "Specified Purpose"); and

(b) to disclose Business Contact Information to other members of IBM Group in pursuit of the Specified Purpose only.

(3) IBM agrees that all Business Contact Information will be processed in accordance with the Data Protection & Electronic Communications Legislation and will be used only for the Specified Purpose.

(4) To the extent required by the Data Protection & Electronic Communications Legislation, Licensee represents that (a) it has obtained (or will obtain) any consents from (and has issued (or will issue) any notices to) the Business Contact Personnel as are necessary in order to enable IBM Group to process and use the Business Contact Information for the Specified Purpose.

(5) Licensee authorizes IBM to transfer Business Contact Information outside the European Economic Area, provided that the transfer is made on contractual terms approved by the Data Protection Authority or the transfer is otherwise permitted under the Data Protection & Electronic Communications Legislation.

AUSTRIA

8.2 Exclusions

The following is deleted from the first paragraph:

MERCHANTABILITY, SATISFACTORY QUALITY

10. Limitation of Liability

The following is added:

The following limitations and exclusions of IBM's liability do not apply for damages caused by gross negligence or willful misconduct.

10.1 Items for Which IBM May Be Liable

The following replaces the first sentence in the first paragraph:

Circumstances may arise where, because of a default by IBM in the performance of its obligations under this Agreement or other liability, Licensee is entitled to recover damages from IBM.

In the second sentence of the first paragraph, delete entirely the parenthetical phrase:

"(including fundamental breach, negligence, misrepresentation, or other contract or tort claim)".

10.2 Items for Which IBM Is Not Liable

The following replaces Item 10.2b:

b. indirect damages or consequential damages; or

BELGIUM, FRANCE, ITALY, AND LUXEMBOURG

10. Limitation of Liability

The following replaces the terms of Section 10 (Limitation of Liability) in its entirety:

Except as otherwise provided by mandatory law:

10.1 Items for Which IBM May Be Liable

IBM's entire liability for all claims in the aggregate for any damages and losses that may arise as a consequence of the fulfillment of its obligations under or in connection with this Agreement or due to any other cause related to this Agreement is limited to the compensation of only those damages and losses proved and actually arising as an immediate and direct consequence of the non-fulfillment of such obligations (if IBM is at fault) or of such cause, for a maximum amount equal to the charges (if the Program is subject to fixed term charges, up to twelve months' charges) Licensee paid for the Program that has caused the damages.

The above limitation will not apply to damages for bodily injuries (including death) and damages to real property and tangible personal property for which IBM is legally liable.

10.2 Items for Which IBM Is Not Liable

UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES IS IBM OR ANY OF ITS PROGRAM DEVELOPERS LIABLE FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING, EVEN IF INFORMED OF THEIR POSSIBILITY: 1) LOSS OF, OR DAMAGE TO, DATA; 2) INCIDENTAL, EXEMPLARY OR INDIRECT DAMAGES, OR FOR ANY ECONOMIC CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES; AND / OR 3) LOST PROFITS, BUSINESS, REVENUE, GOODWILL, OR ANTICIPATED SAVINGS, EVEN IF THEY ARISE AS AN IMMEDIATE CONSEQUENCE OF THE EVENT THAT GENERATED THE DAMAGES.

10.3 Suppliers and Program Developers

The limitation and exclusion of liability herein agreed applies not only to the activities performed by IBM but also to the activities performed by its suppliers and Program developers, and represents the maximum amount for which IBM as well as its suppliers and Program developers are collectively responsible.

GERMANY

8.1 Limited Warranty

The following is inserted at the beginning of Section 8.1:

The Warranty Period is twelve months from the date of delivery of the Program to the original Licensee.

8.2 Exclusions

Section 8.2 is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:

Section 8.1 defines IBM's entire warranty obligations to Licensee except as otherwise required by applicable statutory law.

10. Limitation of Liability

The following replaces the Limitation of Liability section in its entirety:

a. IBM will be liable without limit for 1) loss or damage caused by a breach of an express guarantee; 2) damages or losses resulting in bodily injury (including death); and 3) damages caused intentionally or by gross negligence.

b. In the event of loss, damage and frustrated expenditures caused by slight negligence or in breach of essential contractual obligations, IBM will be liable, regardless of the basis on which Licensee is entitled to claim damages from IBM (including fundamental breach, negligence, misrepresentation, or other contract or tort claim), per claim only up to the greater of 500,000 euro or the charges (if the Program is subject to fixed term charges, up to 12 months' charges) Licensee paid for the Program that caused the loss or damage. A number of defaults which together result in, or contribute to, substantially the same loss or damage will be treated as one default.

c. In the event of loss, damage and frustrated expenditures caused by slight negligence, IBM will not be liable for indirect or consequential damages, even if IBM was informed about the possibility of such loss or damage.

d. In case of delay on IBM's part: 1) IBM will pay to Licensee an amount not exceeding the loss or damage caused by IBM's delay and 2) IBM will be liable only in respect of the resulting damages that Licensee suffers, subject to the provisions of Items a and b above.

13. General

The following replaces the provisions of 13.g:

Any claims resulting from this Agreement are subject to a limitation period of three years, except as stated in Section 8.1 (Limited Warranty) of this Agreement.

The following replaces the provisions of 13.i:

No right or cause of action for any third party is created by this Agreement, nor is IBM responsible for any third party claims against Licensee, except (to the extent permitted in Section 10 (Limitation of Liability)) for: i) bodily injury (including death); or ii) damage to real or tangible personal property for which (in either case) IBM is legally liable to that third party.

IRELAND

8.2 Exclusions

The following paragraph is added:

Except as expressly provided in these terms and conditions, or Section 12 of the Sale of Goods Act 1893 as amended by the Sale of Goods and Supply of Services Act, 1980 (the "1980 Act"), all conditions or warranties (express or implied, statutory or otherwise) are hereby excluded including, without limitation, any warranties implied by the Sale of Goods Act 1893 as amended by the 1980 Act (including, for the avoidance of doubt, Section 39 of the 1980 Act).

IRELAND AND UNITED KINGDOM

2. Agreement Structure

The following sentence is added:

Nothing in this paragraph shall have the effect of excluding or limiting liability for fraud.

10.1 Items for Which IBM May Be Liable

The following replaces the first paragraph of the Subsection:

For the purposes of this section, a "Default" means any act, statement, omission or negligence on the part of IBM in connection with, or in relation to, the subject matter of an Agreement in respect of which IBM is legally liable to Licensee, whether in contract or in tort. A number of Defaults which together result in, or contribute to, substantially the same loss or damage will be treated as one Default.

Circumstances may arise where, because of a Default by IBM in the performance of its obligations under this Agreement or other liability, Licensee is entitled to recover damages from IBM. Regardless of the basis on which Licensee is entitled to claim damages from IBM and except as expressly required by law without the possibility of contractual waiver, IBM's entire liability for any one Default will not exceed the amount of any direct damages, to the extent actually suffered by Licensee as an immediate and direct consequence of the default, up to the greater of (1) 500,000 euro (or the equivalent in local currency) or (2) 125% of the charges (if the Program is subject to fixed term charges, up to 12 months' charges) for the Program that is the subject of the claim. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the amount of any damages for bodily injury (including death) and damage to real property and tangible personal property for which IBM is legally liable is not subject to such limitation.

10.2 Items for Which IBM is Not Liable

The following replaces Items 10.2b and 10.2c:

b. special, incidental, exemplary, or indirect damages or consequential damages; or

c. wasted management time or lost profits, business, revenue, goodwill, or anticipated savings.

Z125-3301-14 (07/2011)



NOTICE

This document includes License Information documents below for multiple Programs. Each License Information document identifies the Program(s) to which it applies. Only those License Information documents for the Program(s) for which Licensee has acquired entitlements apply.


==============================================


LICENSE INFORMATION

The Programs listed below are licensed under the following terms and conditions in addition to those of the IBM International Program License Agreement (IBM form number Z125-3301-14).

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Employee v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Eligible Participant v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records for Non-Production Environment v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Add-On Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Add-On Employee v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Add-On Eligible Participant v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Add-On V5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Add-On for Non-Production Environment V5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Starter Pack Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Add-On Starter Pack Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-R99

Program Name: IBM FileNet P8 Base - ELA v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-R99

Program Name: IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-R99

Program Name: IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-R99

Program Name: IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Toolkit v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-R99

Program Name: IBM FileNet P8 Base - Professional v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-R99

Program Name: IBM FileNet P8 Base - Svr-Included v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-R99

Program Name: IBM FileNet P8 Base - Workgroup v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-R99

As described in the International Program License Agreement ("IPLA") and this License Information, IBM grants Licensee a limited right to use the Program. This right is limited to the level of Authorized Use, such as a Processor Value Unit ("PVU"), a Value Unit ("VU"), or other specified level of use, paid for by Licensee as evidenced in the Proof of Entitlement. Licensee's use may also be limited to a specified machine, or only as a Supporting Program, or subject to other restrictions. As Licensee has not paid for all of the economic value of the Program, no other use is permitted without the payment of additional fees. In addition, as stated in the IPLA, Licensee is not authorized to use the Program to provide commercial IT services to any third party, to provide commercial hosting or timesharing, or to sublicense, rent, or lease the Program unless expressly provided for in the applicable agreements under which Licensee obtains authorizations to use the Program. Additional rights may be available to Licensee subject to the payment of additional fees or under different or supplementary terms. IBM reserves the right to determine whether to make such additional rights available to Licensee.

Program's specifications can be found in the collective Description and Technical Information sections of the Program's Announcement Letters.

Supporting Programs

The Program is licensed as a multi-product package and includes the Supporting Programs identified below. Licensee is authorized to install and use such Supporting Programs only to support Licensee's use of the Principal Program under this Agreement and within the limits of the Proofs of Entitlement for the Program (unless broader rights are provided elsewhere in this License Information document). The phrase "to support Licensee's use" would include only those uses that are necessary or otherwise directly related to a licensed use of the Principal Program or another Supporting Program. The Supporting Programs may not be used for any other purpose. Licensee is not authorized to transfer or remarket the Supporting Programs separate from the Principal Program. A Supporting Program may be accompanied by license terms, and those terms, if any, apply to Licensee's use of that Supporting Program. In the event of conflict, the terms in this License Information document supersede the Supporting Program's terms. When Licensee's right to use the Program expires or terminates, Licensee must discontinue use, destroy or promptly return all copies of the Supporting Programs to the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program. If Licensee downloaded the Supporting Programs, Licensee should contact the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program. If Licensee wishes to license the Supporting Programs for any use beyond the limits set forth above, please contact an IBM Sales Representative or the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program to obtain the appropriate license.

The following are Supporting Programs licensed with the Program:
IBM FileNet Content Manager V5.2
IBM Retention Policy Syndication Framework V6.0.3
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence V10.2.1

Permitted Components

Notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, Licensee is permitted to use only the following components or functions of the identified Supporting Program:
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence Reporting of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence
IBM Cognos Supporting Languages Documentation of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence Samples of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence

Non-Production Limitation

If the Program is designated as "Non-Production", the Program can only be deployed as part of the Licensee's internal development and test environment for internal non-production activities, including but not limited to testing, performance tuning, fault diagnosis, internal benchmarking, staging, quality assurance activity and/or developing internally used additions or extensions to the Program using published application programming interfaces. Licensee is not authorized to use any part of the Program for any other purposes without acquiring the appropriate production entitlements.

Source Components and Sample Materials

The Program may include some components in source code form ("Source Components") and other materials identified as Sample Materials. Licensee may copy and modify Source Components and Sample Materials for internal use only provided such use is within the limits of the license rights under this Agreement, provided however that Licensee may not alter or delete any copyright information or notices contained in the Source Components or Sample Materials. IBM provides the Source Components and Sample Materials without obligation of support and "AS IS", WITH NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING THE WARRANTY OF TITLE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OR NON-INTERFERENCE AND THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES AND CONDITIONS OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Restrictions on Use for the Benefit of a Third Party

Licensee may not use the Program or any component thereof to provide service bureau, hosting services, or any sort of commercial information technology services to third parties, or transfer the Program to a third party, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by IBM.

Processor Value Unit (PVU)

Processor Value Unit (PVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. The number of PVU entitlements required is based on the processor technology (defined within the PVU Table by Processor Vendor, Brand, Type and Model Number at http://www.ibm.com/software/lotus/passportadvantage/pvu_licensing_for_customers.html) and the number of processors made available to the Program. IBM continues to define a processor, for the purpose of PVU-based licensing, to be each processor core on a chip. A dual-core processor chip, for example, has two processor cores.

Licensee can deploy the Program using either Full Capacity licensing or Virtualization Capacity (Sub-Capacity) licensing according to the Passport Advantage Sub-Capacity Licensing Terms (see webpage below). If using Full Capacity licensing, Licensee must obtain PVU entitlements sufficient to cover all activated processor cores* in the physical hardware environment made available to or managed by the Program, except for those servers from which the Program has been permanently removed. If using Virtualization Capacity licensing, Licensee must obtain entitlements sufficient to cover all activated processor cores made available to or managed by the Program, as defined according to the Virtualization Capacity License Counting Rules at http://www.ibm.com/software/lotus/passportadvantage/Counting_Software_licenses_using_specific_virtualization_technologies.html.

* An Activated processor core is a processor core that is available for use in a physical or virtual server, regardless of whether the capacity of the processor core can be or is limited through virtualization technologies, operating system commands, BIOS settings, or similar restrictions.

Resource Value Unit (RVU)

Resource Value Unit (RVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. RVU Proofs of Entitlement are based on the number of units of a specific resource used or managed by the Program. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements for the number of RVUs required for Licensee's environment for the specific resources as specified in the table below. RVU entitlements are specific to the Program and the type of resource and may not be exchanged, interchanged, or aggregated with RVU entitlements of another program or resource.

User Value Unit (UVU)

User Value Unit (UVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. UVU Proofs of Entitlement are based on the number and type of Users for the given Program. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements for the number of UVUs required for Licensee's environment as specified in the table below. The UVU entitlements are specific to the Program and type of user and may not be exchanged, interchanged, or aggregated with UVU entitlements of another program or type of user.

General Charge Terms

1. User Value Unit Conversion Tables

Any individual whose content is declared as records or any individual who authors, accesses, retrieves, views, or reviews content that has been declared as records, regardless of when the records are declared is considered to have been given access to the Program and counts as a user.

a. User Value Unit Licensing based on Authorized Users and Add-On Authorized Users

i. The Users for the purposes of UVU calculation are Authorized Users. An Authorized User is a unique person who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. An entitlement for an Authorized User is unique to that Authorized User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person.

Any computing device that requests the execution of or receives for execution a set of commands, procedures, or applications from the Program or that is otherwise managed by the Program is considered a separate User of the Program and requires an entitlement as if that device were a person.

From 1 to 20 Users, 1.00 UVU per User
From 21 to 50 Users, 20 UVUs plus 0.83 UVUs per User above 20 
From 51 to 100 Users, 44.9 UVUs plus 0.80 UVUs per User above 50
From 101 to 250 Users, 84.9 UVUs plus 0.76 UVUs per User above 100 
From 251 to 500 Users, 198.9 UVUs plus 0.60 UVUs per User above 250 
From 501 to 1,000 Users, 348.9 UVUs plus 0.50 UVUs per User above 500 
From 1,001 to 5,000 Users, 598.9 UVUs plus 0.47 UVUs per User above 1,000 
From 5,001 to 10,000 Users, 2,478.9 UVUs plus 0.40 UVUs per User above 5,000 
From 10,001 to 25,000 Users, 4,478.9 UVUs plus 0.36 UVUs per User above 10,000 
For more than 25,000 Users, 9,878.9 UVUs plus 0.33 UVUs per User above 25,000 

ii. Infrequent User

"Infrequent User" means an Authorized User who accesses the Program not more than one hundred twenty (120) times in any consecutive 12 month period. A single access is comprised of one or more interactions between the Authorized User and the Program or actions performed on behalf of the Authorized User by the Program, all within a consecutive 15 minute period. 

For the specific Programs listed below, on the condition that Licensee creates a mechanism to track accesses by Authorized Users to verify that they meet the requirements of Infrequent Users, Infrequent Users need not be counted as full Authorized Users. A ratio of ten (10) Infrequent Users will equal one (1) Authorized User for the purpose of calculating Authorized UVUs. Programs eligible to use the Infrequent User ratio in calculating required Authorized UVUs are:

- IBM Enterprise Records Authorized
- IBM Enterprise Records Add-On Authorized
- IBM Enterprise Records Starter Pack Authorized
- IBM Enterprise Records Add-On Starter Pack Authorized

Licensee agrees to provide to IBM and its auditors details of the tracking mechanism described above, upon request.
 
b. User Value Unit Licensing based on Employee Users and Add-On Employee Users

The Users for the purpose of UVU calculation are Employee Users. An Employee User is a unique person employed in Licensee's Enterprise, whether or not given access to the Program, or a unique person otherwise paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. An entitlement for an Employee User is unique to that Employee User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person. 

Licensee must acquire sufficient UVU entitlements to cover all employees and any other unique persons paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise.

From 1,000 to 2,500 Users, 1.00 UVU per User
From 2,501 to 5,000 Users, 2,500 UVUs plus 0.80 UVUs per User above 2,500 
From 5,001 to 10,000 Users, 4,500 UVUs plus 0.70 UVUs per User above 5,000 
From 10,001 to 30,000 Users, 8,000 UVUs plus 0.65 UVUs per User above 10,000
From 30,001 to 50,000 Users, 21,000 UVUs plus 0.55 UVUs per User above 30,000
From 50,001 to 100,000 Users, 32,000 UVUs plus 0.50 UVUs per User above 50,000
From 100,001 to 300,000 Users, 57,000 UVUs plus 0.46 UVUs per User above 100,000
From 300,001 to 500,000 Users, 149,000 UVUs plus 0.40 UVUs per User above 300,000
From 500,001 to 1,000,000 Users, 229,000 UVUs plus 0.36 UVUs per User above 500,000
For more than 1,000,000 Users, 409,000 UVUs plus 0.32 UVUs per User above 1,000,000 

2. Resource Value Unit Licensing

a. Resource Value Unit Licensing based on Eligible Participants

The Resource for the purpose of RVU calculation is an Eligible Participant. Each individual or entity eligible to participate in any service delivery program managed or tracked by the Program is an Eligible Participant. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements to cover all Eligible Participants. 

From 1,000 to 10,000 Resources, 1.00 RVU per Resource
From 10,001 to 50,000 Resources, 10,000 RVUs plus 0.87 RVUs per Resource above 10,000
From 50,001 to100,000 Resources, 44,800 RVUs plus 0.60 RVUs per Resource above 50,000
From 100,001 to 500,000 Resources, 74,800 RVUs plus 0.25 RVUs per Resource above 100,000
From 500,001 to 1,000,000 Resources, 174,800 RVUs plus 0.20 RVUs per Resource above 500,000
From 1,000,001 to 10,000,000 Resources, 274,800 RVUs plus 0.07 RVUs per Resource above 1,000,000
From 10,000,001 to 25,000,000 Resources, 904,800 RVUs plus 0.04 RVUs per Resource above 10,000,000
From 25,000,001 to 50,000,000 Resources, 1,504,800 RVUs plus 0.03 RVUs per Resource above 25,000,000
From 50,000,001 to 100,000,000 Resources, 2,254,800 RVUs plus 0.02 RVUs per Resource above 50,000,000
For more than 100,000,000 Resources, 3,254,800 RVUs plus 0.01 RVUs per Resource above 100,000,000

Cumulative Entitlements

UVU based on Authorized User, UVU based on Employee User, and RVU based on Eligible Participant entitlements are not alternative means for licensing the Program. Licensee must obtain: (a) sufficient Authorized User UVU entitlements to cover any Licensee employee (which for the purpose of this paragraph includes any non-employee who is paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise) who is given access to the Program, or sufficient Employee User UVU entitlements to cover all employees whether or not they are given access to the Program; and (b) sufficient Eligible Participant RVU entitlements to cover any non-Employee Users of the Program. 


Program-unique Terms

A. Program Restrictions

1. Supporting Program Details

IBM FileNet Content Manager

Use Limitations: Unrestricted for any entitlement not identified as "Add-On" 

"Unrestricted" means that, notwithstanding the language above, Licensee's right to use the Supporting Program is not limited to use only in support of Licensee's use of the Principal Program. While the other restrictions on Licensee's use of the Supporting Program continue to apply, Licensee may use the Supporting Program for purposes independent of the licensed use of the Principal Program.

2. Permitted Components 

For any Program  designated as "Add-On", except for when Licensee  is applying the "Add-On" to IBM Content Foundation, notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, Licensee is permitted to use only the following components or functions of the identified Supporting Program:

- Content Federation Services Capability (of FileNet Content Manager)

3. Prohibited Components

Notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, for any Program not designated as "Add-On",  Licensee is not authorized to use any of the following components or functions of the Program:

- Custom workflow creation (of FileNet Content Manager)

4. Starter Pack Program Restrictions

a. For any Program  acquired by Licensee identified as "Starter Pack", Licensee may not use the Program to connect to any other instance or deployment of the Program.

b. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, use of any Program designated as "Starter Pack" may not exceed fourteen hundred (1,400) Authorized Users per instance. 

5. Components Used for Establishing Required Processor Value Unit (PVU) Entitlements

When determining the number of entitlements required for Licensee's installation or use of the Program, the installation or use of only the following Program components are taken into consideration. In other words, Licensee may install and use Program components other than those listed below, under the license terms, but only the listed components are used to determine the number of entitlements required for the Program.

Content Platform Engine

B. Non-Passport Advantage Program Specific Terns, Conditions and Restrictions
 
If Licensee is licensed to use one of the following Programs (the "Non-Passport Advantage Programs"):

- IBM Enterprise Records 
- IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development 
- IBM FileNet P8 Base - ELA 
- IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application 
- IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform 
- IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Toolkit 
- IBM FileNet P8 Base - Professional 
- IBM FileNet P8 Base - Svr-Included 
- IBM FileNet P8 Base - Workgroup 
- IBM FileNet Content Engine 

as indicated on the applicable PoE, the provisions of this Section B will apply to any and all use of that Program. With respect to the Non-Passport Advantage Programs, in the event of a conflict between the terms of this Section B and the other sections of this License Information document, the terms of this Section B will prevail.

1. Definitions. The following definitions will only apply for the purposes of this Section B:

(a) "Activated Processor" means a processor core that is available for use in a physical or virtual server, regardless of whether the capacity of the processor core can be or is limited through virtualization technologies, operating system commands, BIOS settings, or similar restrictions.

(b) "Client" means any personal computer, minicomputer, mainframe, workstation or other computer device that interacts with a Server Program; provided, however, that for the purposes of this agreement, "Client" will not be construed to mean a computer server running the Server Program.

(c) "Computing Environment" means either (a) a single physical computer, computer partition, or blade computer or (b) two or more physical computers, computer partitions, or blade computers that are linked by a network and that operate together on the same workloads as if they were a single physical computer.

(d) "CPU" means a functional unit within a computing device that interprets and executes instructions. A CPU consists of at least an instruction control unit and one or more arithmetic or logic units. Where multicore technology is employed, each core is considered a CPU.

(e) " Device" means any computing device that requests the execution of a set of commands, procedures, or applications from another computer system that is typically referred to as a Server. Multiple Devices may share access to a common Server. A Device generally has some processing capability or is programmable to allow a User to do work. Examples include, but are not limited to: appliances, automated teller machines, cash registers, desktop computers, kiosks, notebook computers, personal digital assistants, point-of-sale terminals, and technical workstations.

(f) "Employee" means a unique person employed in Licensee's Enterprise, whether or not given access to the Program, or a unique person otherwise paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means.

(g) "Enterprise" means any legal entity that at all times (i) Licensee owns or has under Licensee's common control by a factor of fifty percent (50%) or more and (ii) that is the legal entity that is authorized to execute and administer this agreement on behalf of the Enterprise. For the purposes of any Enterprise license granted under this agreement, "Enterprise" will exclude (1) any new entity acquired by virtue of merger or acquisition after the effective date of this agreement, and (2) any entity that, at any time during the term of this agreement, is sold, "spun off", liquidated, or that otherwise ceases to satisfy the elements of the definition of Enterprise set forth above.

(h) "Processor" means each processor core on the chip.

(i) "Server" means a computer system that executes requested procedures, commands, or applications to one or more Users and/or Devices over a network. Where "blade" or "virtual server" technology is employed, each "blade" or "virtual server" counts as a discrete Server.

(j) "Server Program" means a single copy (or partial copy) of a Program residing on a single physical computer Server within a System. For clarity, a virtual computer Server environment within a physical Server is considered a separate computer Server, and is counted as a second Server for license purposes.

(k) "System" means a discrete group of Licensee's internal computer systems as designated by a unique IBM issued system identification number.

(l) "User" means an individual permitted by Licensee to use or access the Program, directly or indirectly, and regardless of whether the individual is actively using the Program at any given time or has ever used the Program. If a Client is programmed to use or access the Program in an automatic manner, then each discrete Client and each User benefitting from the use of the Client is counted as an individual User.

2. Non-Passport Advantage Program General Charge Terms.

(a) Concurrent User. If Licensee is licensed on a Concurrent User basis, the following will apply: Each Concurrent User license acquired by Licensee and shown on Licensee's PoE, entitles a designated group of Users to access the Program where the designated group does not exceed ten (10) Users and the maximum number of Users within that group accessing the Program at any one time may not exceed one (1) User for each Concurrent User license acquired by Licensee. The total number of Concurrent Users using the licensed Programs may not exceed the number evidenced by the applicable PoE.

(b) CPU. If Licensee is licensed on a CPU basis, the following will apply: A PoE must be acquired for all activated CPUs available for use by any Servers in the Computing Environment affiliated with the Program (even if this exceeds the number of Servers on which the Program itself runs). The total number of CPUs that are attached or otherwise available to run the Program may not exceed the number authorized by the applicable PoE.

(c) Device. If Licensee is licensed on a Device basis, the following will apply: For each Device license Licensee obtains, Licensee may install the licensed Programs on one (1) Device. A PoE must be obtained for each Device accessing the Program in any manner. The total number of Devices on which the licensed Programs are installed may not exceed the number evidenced by the applicable PoE.

(d) eBusiness User. If Licensee is licensed on an eBusiness User basis, the following will apply: Each eBusiness User license acquired by Licensee and shown on Licensee's PoE, entitles a designated eBusiness group of Users to access the Program where the designated eBusiness group does not exceed one hundred (100) Users and the maximum number of Users in the group accessing the Program at any one time may not exceed one (1) User for each eBusiness User license acquired by Licensee. The total number of eBusiness Users using the licensed Programs may not exceed the number evidenced by the applicable PoE.

(e) ELA Employee. If Licensee is licensed on an ELA Employee basis, the following will apply: Each ELA Employee has the same rights as a Named User. The quantity of ELA Employee licenses purchased and shown on Licensee's POE must at all times be equal to or greater than the total employee headcount of Licensee's Enterprise or the specified business unit, plus all external agents or contractors acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise or the distinct business unit. The total number of ELA Employees using the licensed Programs may not exceed the number evidenced by the applicable PoE.

(f) Expansion User. If Licensee is licensed on an Expansion User basis, the following will apply: Each Expansion Named User license, Expansion Concurrent User license and Expansion eBusiness User license acquired by Licensee and shown on Licensee's PoE has the same rights and limitations as the correlative Named, Concurrent, or eBusiness User licenses; provided, however, that Expansion User licenses may only be acquired if the prerequisites to purchase those Expansion User licenses have been satisfied. The total number of Expansion Users using the licensed Programs may not exceed the number evidenced by the applicable PoE.

(g) External User. If Licensee is licensed on an External User basis, the following will apply: Each External User license entitles a specified group of Users limited access to Licensee's System to review in read-only mode information specific to each individual User. The specified group of Users is restricted to persons who are not Employees, agents, or contractors of Licensee, and may be subject to further limitations set forth in Licensee's PoE. The size of the specified group of Users is limited to the number of authorized External Users evidenced by the applicable POE.

(h) Named User. If Licensee is licensed on a Named User basis, the following will apply: Each Named User license acquired by Licensee and shown on Licensee's PoE entitles a single designated User to access the Program with no maximum limit on the duration of access or on the number of discrete accesses. The total number of Named Users using the licensed Programs may not exceed the number evidenced by the applicable PoE.

(i) Processor Value Unit. If Licensee is licensed on a Processor Value Unit ("PVU") basis, the following will apply: Licensee must obtain a PoE for the appropriate number of Processor Value Unit entitlements for Licensee's implementation. The number of Processor Value Unit entitlements required for Licensee's specific implementation of the given Program must be obtained from a conversion table associated with the Program. Licensee must obtain PVU entitlements sufficient to cover all Activated Processors in the physical hardware environment made available to or managed by the Program, except for those servers from which the Program has been permanently removed. The Processor Value Unit entitlements of a given Program cannot be exchanged, interchanged, or aggregated with Processor Value Unit entitlements of another Program. To determine the number of Processor Value Unit entitlements required, refer to the processor value unit conversion table at: http://www.ibm.com/software/sw-lotus/services/cwepassport.nsf/wdocs/pvu_table_for_customers or that is provided to Licensee in conjunction with Licensee's PoE.

(j) Server. If Licensee is licensed on a Server basis, the following will apply: For each Server license Licensee is granted, Licensee may install the licensed Programs on one (1) Server. A license, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, must be obtained for each Server on which the Program or a component of the Program is run and for each Server managed by the Program. The total number of Servers on which the licensed Programs are installed may not exceed the number evidenced by the PoE.

3. Non-Passport Advantage Program General Terms, Conditions, and Restrictions.

(a) Additional Charge Information. If Licensee elects to use a concentrator or multiplexer technology to provide Users with access to the Program (whether hardware or software; e.g., web/IP Server, gateway, etc.), then all Clients with the ability to access the Program via that technology will be counted individually for licensing purposes.

(b) Non-Production Limitation . If Licensee acquires a license for non-production use of a Program (also indicated by the notation "Non-Prod" with respect to a Program in the PoE), then Licensee is not permitted to use that Program for production use (including but not limited to processing of production data or for transferring data to any production business system) and Licensee's use of that Program must be strictly limited to development, testing, or quality assurance activities directly associated with implementation and maintenance of the Programs.

Further, Licensee may only use Non-Prod Programs for one of the following uses at any given time and for no other purposes:

(1) For disaster recovery by replacing the function of the Program on a delayed basis when the Program has become temporarily unavailable due to a disaster or other serious problem;

(2) For high availability by automatically or quickly replacing the function of the Program when it has become temporarily unavailable due to a disaster or other serious problem; or

(3) For development by conducting development, testing, or quality assurance activities directly associated with implementation and maintenance of the Programs.

(c) Non-Transferable. All Licenses are non-transferable and must be used solely for Licensee's own internal use on Licensee's Systems and in full compliance with all terms, conditions, and restrictions of this agreement and all applicable laws and regulations. Software programs or components other than the Program may be contained on the media on which the Program is delivered to Licensee. Use of such other software programs or components is prohibited unless Licensee acquires additional, appropriate Licenses from IBM.

4. Non-Passport Advantage Program Specific Terms, Conditions, and Restrictions for IBM FileNet P8 Base.

(a) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application. If Licensee is licensed under an IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application license, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, the following will apply:

(1) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application License is granted only in conjunction with the other IBM P8 Programs specifically identified on the PoE and in Section B(4)(a)(2) below (the "Application Related IBM Programs") and provides Licensee with the right to install one (1) instance of the Application Related IBM Programs on one (1) Server. The total number of Servers on which the Application Related IBM Programs are installed may not exceed the number evidenced by the PoE;

(2) If Licensee is licensed to use IBM Enterprise Records software, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, the Application Related IBM Program Programs will be: Application Engine, FileNet Connector for SharePoint Web Parts, and FileNet Workplace XT; and

(3) If Licensee purchases additional IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application Licenses, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, for each additional IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application license Licensee purchases, the total number of Servers on which Licensee may exercise the rights set forth in Section B(4)(b) below will be increased by one (1).

(b) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform. If Licensee is licensed under an IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform License, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, the following will apply:

(1) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform license is granted only in conjunction with the other IBM P8 Programs specifically identified on the PoE and in Section B(4)(b)(2) below (the "Platform Related IBM Programs") and provides Licensee with the right to install one (1) instance of the Platform Related IBM Programs on one (1) Server. The total number of Servers on which the Platform Related IBM Programs are installed may not exceed the number evidenced by the PoE;

(2) For the purposes of the IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform License, the following will apply: if Licensee is licensed to use IBM Enterprise Records software, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, the Platform Related IBM Programs will be: Content Engine and Process Engine; and

(3) If Licensee purchases additional IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform Licenses, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, for each additional IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform license Licensee purchases, the total number of Servers on which Licensee may exercise the rights set forth in Section B(4)(b)(1) above will be increased by one (1).

(c) IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development. If Licensee has acquired the right to use the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development package, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, then in addition to such other limitations as apply, Licensee may only use that Program in accordance with the following terms, conditions, and restrictions:

(1) Licensee is granted one (1) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform license for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development package; and

(2) Licensee is granted one (1) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application license for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development package. Licensee's use of software and Clients in conjunction with the IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform and IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application licenses (collectively the "P8 Base Servers") is further subject to the following restrictions:

(i) Licensee is not permitted to use the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development package for production use (including but not limited to processing of production data or for transferring data to any production business system) and Licensee's use of the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development package must be strictly limited to development, testing, or quality assurance activities directly associated with implementation and maintenance of the Platform Related IBM Programs;

(ii) For each IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development package Licensee is licensed to use, as indicated on the applicable PoE, the collective number of Named User, Concurrent User, and eBusiness User licenses designated for use or actually used with the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development package, regardless of type, may not exceed ten (10);

(iii) Each Named User, Concurrent User, and eBusiness User licenses used in conjunction with Licensee's IBM FileNet P8 Base - Development package and the Platform Related IBM Programs must also be designated by IBM for use with the System on which the Platform Related IBM Programs are installed; and

(iv) Licensee may only connect to the P8 Base Servers using Programs licensed to Licensee by IBM and only to the level of use specified in the applicable PoE.

(d) IBM FileNet P8 Base - Workgroup. If Licensee has acquired the right to use the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Workgroup package, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, then in addition to such other limitations as may apply, Licensee may only use the Programs in accordance with the following terms, conditions, and restrictions:

(1) Licensee is granted one (1) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform license for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Workgroup package;

(2) Licensee is granted one (1) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application license for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Workgroup package; and

(3) Licensee's use of software and Clients in conjunction with the P8 Base Servers is further subject to the following restrictions:

(i) For each IBM FileNet P8 Base - Workgroup package Licensee is licensed to use, as indicated on the applicable PoE, the collective number of Named User, Concurrent User, and eBusiness User licenses designated for use or actually used with the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Workgroup package, regardless of type, may not exceed seventy-five (75);

(ii) Each Named User, Concurrent User, and eBusiness User license used in conjunction with Licensee's IBM FileNet P8 Base - Workgroup package and the Platform Related IBM Programs must also be designated by IBM for use with the System on which the Platform Related IBM Programs are installed; and

(iii) Licensee may only connect to the P8 Base Servers using Programs licensed to Licensee by IBM and only to the level of use specified in the PoE.

(e) IBM FileNet P8 Base - Professional. If Licensee has acquired the right to use the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Professional package, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, then in addition to such other limitations as apply, Licensee may only use the Programs in accordance with the following terms, conditions, and restrictions:

(1) Licensee is granted two (2) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform licenses for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Professional package;

(2) Licensee is granted two (2) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application licenses for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the IBM FileNet P8 Base - Professional package; and

(3) Licensee's use of software and Clients in conjunction with the P8 Base Servers is further subject to the following restriction: Licensee may only connect to the P8 Base Servers using software licensed to Licensee by IBM and only to the level of use specified in the applicable PoE.

(f) IBM FileNet P8 Base - ELA (the "ELA Package"). If Licensee has the right to use the ELA Package, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, then in addition to such other limitations as apply, Licensee may only use the Programs in accordance with the following terms, conditions, and restrictions:

(1) Licensee is granted five (5) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application licenses for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the ELA Package;

(2) Licensee is granted an unlimited number of IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform licenses for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the ELA Package;

(3) Licensee may only use IBM FileNet ELA Employee User Licenses with the ELA Package; and

(4) Licensee's use of software and Clients in conjunction with the P8 Base Servers is further subject to the following restriction: Licensee may only connect to the P8 Base Servers using software licensed to Licensee by IBM and only to the level of use specified in the applicable PoE.

(g) IBM FileNet P8 Base - Svr-Included (the "Server-Included Package"). If Licensee has the right to use the Server-Included Package, as evidenced on the applicable PoE, then in addition to such other limitations as apply, Licensee may only use the Programs in accordance with the following terms, conditions, and restrictions:

(1) Licensee is granted five (5) IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Application licenses for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the Server-Included Package;

(2) Licensee is granted an unlimited number of IBM FileNet P8 Base - P8 Platform licenses for Licensee's internal use in conjunction with the Server-Included Package;

(3) Licensee may only use IBM FileNet Named, Concurrent, or eBusiness User licenses with the Server-Included Package; and

(4) Licensee's use of software and Clients in conjunction with the P8 Base Servers is further subject to the following restriction: Licensee may only connect to the P8 Base Servers using software licensed to Licensee by IBM and only to the level of use specified in the applicable PoE.


L/N:  L-NBAE-9KRN5F
D/N:  L-NBAE-9KRN5F
P/N:  L-NBAE-9KRN5F 


==============================================


LICENSE INFORMATION

The Programs listed below are licensed under the following terms and conditions in addition to those of the IBM International Program License Agreement (IBM form number Z125-3301-14).

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Content Collector Edition Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Content Collector Edition Employee v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Content Collector Edition Eligible Participant v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Content Collector Edition v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Content Collector Edition for Non-Production Environment v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

As described in the International Program License Agreement ("IPLA") and this License Information, IBM grants Licensee a limited right to use the Program. This right is limited to the level of Authorized Use, such as a Processor Value Unit ("PVU"), a Value Unit ("VU"), or other specified level of use, paid for by Licensee as evidenced in the Proof of Entitlement. Licensee's use may also be limited to a specified machine, or only as a Supporting Program, or subject to other restrictions. As Licensee has not paid for all of the economic value of the Program, no other use is permitted without the payment of additional fees. In addition, as stated in the IPLA, Licensee is not authorized to use the Program to provide commercial IT services to any third party, to provide commercial hosting or timesharing, or to sublicense, rent, or lease the Program unless expressly provided for in the applicable agreements under which Licensee obtains authorizations to use the Program. Additional rights may be available to Licensee subject to the payment of additional fees or under different or supplementary terms. IBM reserves the right to determine whether to make such additional rights available to Licensee.

Program's specifications can be found in the collective Description and Technical Information sections of the Program's Announcement Letters.

Supporting Programs

The Program is licensed as a multi-product package and includes the Supporting Programs identified below. Licensee is authorized to install and use such Supporting Programs only to support Licensee's use of the Principal Program under this Agreement and within the limits of the Proofs of Entitlement for the Program (unless broader rights are provided elsewhere in this License Information document). The phrase "to support Licensee's use" would include only those uses that are necessary or otherwise directly related to a licensed use of the Principal Program or another Supporting Program. The Supporting Programs may not be used for any other purpose. Licensee is not authorized to transfer or remarket the Supporting Programs separate from the Principal Program. A Supporting Program may be accompanied by license terms, and those terms, if any, apply to Licensee's use of that Supporting Program. In the event of conflict, the terms in this License Information document supersede the Supporting Program's terms. When Licensee's right to use the Program expires or terminates, Licensee must discontinue use, destroy or promptly return all copies of the Supporting Programs to the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program. If Licensee downloaded the Supporting Programs, Licensee should contact the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program. If Licensee wishes to license the Supporting Programs for any use beyond the limits set forth above, please contact an IBM Sales Representative or the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program to obtain the appropriate license.

The following are Supporting Programs licensed with the Program:
IBM FileNet Content Manager V5.2
IBM Retention Policy Syndication Framework V6.0.3
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence V10.2.1

Permitted Components

Notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, Licensee is permitted to use only the following components or functions of the identified Supporting Program:
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence Reporting of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence
IBM Cognos Supporting Languages Documentation of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence Samples of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence

Non-Production Limitation

If the Program is designated as "Non-Production", the Program can only be deployed as part of the Licensee's internal development and test environment for internal non-production activities, including but not limited to testing, performance tuning, fault diagnosis, internal benchmarking, staging, quality assurance activity and/or developing internally used additions or extensions to the Program using published application programming interfaces. Licensee is not authorized to use any part of the Program for any other purposes without acquiring the appropriate production entitlements.

Source Components and Sample Materials

The Program may include some components in source code form ("Source Components") and other materials identified as Sample Materials. Licensee may copy and modify Source Components and Sample Materials for internal use only provided such use is within the limits of the license rights under this Agreement, provided however that Licensee may not alter or delete any copyright information or notices contained in the Source Components or Sample Materials. IBM provides the Source Components and Sample Materials without obligation of support and "AS IS", WITH NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING THE WARRANTY OF TITLE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OR NON-INTERFERENCE AND THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES AND CONDITIONS OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Restrictions on Use for the Benefit of a Third Party

Licensee may not use the Program or any component thereof to provide service bureau, hosting services, or any sort of commercial information technology services to third parties, or transfer the Program to a third party, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by IBM.

Processor Value Unit (PVU)

Processor Value Unit (PVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. The number of PVU entitlements required is based on the processor technology (defined within the PVU Table by Processor Vendor, Brand, Type and Model Number at http://www.ibm.com/software/lotus/passportadvantage/pvu_licensing_for_customers.html) and the number of processors made available to the Program. IBM continues to define a processor, for the purpose of PVU-based licensing, to be each processor core on a chip. A dual-core processor chip, for example, has two processor cores.

Licensee can deploy the Program using either Full Capacity licensing or Virtualization Capacity (Sub-Capacity) licensing according to the Passport Advantage Sub-Capacity Licensing Terms (see webpage below). If using Full Capacity licensing, Licensee must obtain PVU entitlements sufficient to cover all activated processor cores* in the physical hardware environment made available to or managed by the Program, except for those servers from which the Program has been permanently removed. If using Virtualization Capacity licensing, Licensee must obtain entitlements sufficient to cover all activated processor cores made available to or managed by the Program, as defined according to the Virtualization Capacity License Counting Rules at http://www.ibm.com/software/lotus/passportadvantage/Counting_Software_licenses_using_specific_virtualization_technologies.html.

* An Activated processor core is a processor core that is available for use in a physical or virtual server, regardless of whether the capacity of the processor core can be or is limited through virtualization technologies, operating system commands, BIOS settings, or similar restrictions.

Resource Value Unit (RVU)

Resource Value Unit (RVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. RVU Proofs of Entitlement are based on the number of units of a specific resource used or managed by the Program. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements for the number of RVUs required for Licensee's environment for the specific resources as specified in the table below. RVU entitlements are specific to the Program and the type of resource and may not be exchanged, interchanged, or aggregated with RVU entitlements of another program or resource.

User Value Unit (UVU)

User Value Unit (UVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. UVU Proofs of Entitlement are based on the number and type of Users for the given Program. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements for the number of UVUs required for Licensee's environment as specified in the table below. The UVU entitlements are specific to the Program and type of user and may not be exchanged, interchanged, or aggregated with UVU entitlements of another program or type of user.

General Charge Terms

1. User Value Unit Conversion Tables

Any individual whose content is declared as records or any individual who authors, accesses, retrieves, views, or reviews content that has been declared as records, regardless of when the records are declared is considered to have been given access to the Program and counts as a user.

a. User Value Unit Licensing based on Authorized Users 

The Users for the purpose of UVU calculation are Authorized Users. An Authorized User is a unique person who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. An entitlement for an Authorized User is unique to that Authorized User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person.

Any computing device that requests the execution of or receives for execution a set of commands, procedures, or applications from the Program or that is otherwise managed by the Program is considered a separate User of the Program and requires an entitlement as if that device were a person.

From 1 to 20 Users, 1.00 UVU per User
From 21 to 50 Users, 20 UVUs plus 0.83 UVUs per User above 20 
From 51 to 100 Users, 44.9 UVUs plus 0.80 UVUs per User above 50
From 101 to 250 Users, 84.9 UVUs plus 0.76 UVUs per User above 100 
From 251 to 500 Users, 198.9 UVUs plus 0.60 UVUs per User above 250 
From 501 to 1,000 Users, 348.9 UVUs plus 0.50 UVUs per User above 500 
From 1,001 to 5,000 Users, 598.9 UVUs plus 0.47 UVUs per User above 1,000 
From 5,001 to 10,000 Users, 2,478.9 UVUs plus 0.40 UVUs per User above 5,000 
From 10,001 to 25,000 Users, 4,478.9 UVUs plus 0.36 UVUs per User above 10,000 
For more than 25,000 Users, 9,878.9 UVUs plus 0.33 UVUs per User above 25,000 

b. User Value Unit Licensing based on Employee Users 

The Users for the purpose of UVU calculation are Employee Users. An Employee User is a unique person employed in Licensee's Enterprise, whether or not given access to the Program, or a unique person otherwise paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. An entitlement for an Employee User is unique to that Employee User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person. 

Licensee must acquire sufficient UVU entitlements to cover all employees and any other unique persons paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise.

From 1,000 to 2,500 Users, 1.00 UVU per User
From 2,501 to 5,000 Users, 2,500 UVUs plus 0.80 UVUs per User above 2,500 
From 5,001 to 10,000 Users, 4,500 UVUs plus 0.70 UVUs per User above 5,000 
From 10,001 to 30,000 Users, 8,000 UVUs plus 0.65 UVUs per User above 10,000
From 30,001 to 50,000 Users, 21,000 UVUs plus 0.55 UVUs per User above 30,000
From 50,001 to 100,000 Users, 32,000 UVUs plus 0.50 UVUs per User above 50,000
From 100,001 to 300,000 Users, 57,000 UVUs plus 0.46 UVUs per User above 100,000
From 300,001 to 500,000 Users, 149,000 UVUs plus 0.40 UVUs per User above 300,000
From 500,001 to 1,000,000 Users, 229,000 UVUs plus 0.36 UVUs per User above 500,000
For more than 1,000,000 Users, 409,000 UVUs plus 0.32 UVUs per User above 1,000,000 

2. Resource Value Unit Licensing

a. Resource Value Unit Licensing based on Eligible Participants

The Resource for the purpose of RVU calculation is an Eligible Participant. Each individual or entity eligible to participate in any service delivery program managed or tracked by the Program is an Eligible Participant. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements to cover all Eligible Participants. 

From 1,000 to 10,000 Resources, 1.00 RVU per Resource
From 10,001 to 50,000 Resources, 10,000 RVUs plus 0.87 RVUs per Resource above 10,000
From 50,001 to100,000 Resources, 44,800 RVUs plus 0.60 RVUs per Resource above 50,000
From 100,001 to 500,000 Resources, 74,800 RVUs plus 0.25 RVUs per Resource above 100,000
From 500,001 to 1,000,000 Resources, 174,800 RVUs plus 0.20 RVUs per Resource above 500,000
From 1,000,001 to 10,000,000 Resources, 274,800 RVUs plus 0.07 RVUs per Resource above 1,000,000
From 10,000,001 to 25,000,000 Resources, 904,800 RVUs plus 0.04 RVUs per Resource above 10,000,000
From 25,000,001 to 50,000,000 Resources, 1,504,800 RVUs plus 0.03 RVUs per Resource above 25,000,000
From 50,000,001 to 100,000,000 Resources, 2,254,800 RVUs plus 0.02 RVUs per Resource above 50,000,000
For more than 100,000,000 Resources, 3,254,800 RVUs plus 0.01 RVUs per Resource above 100,000,000

Cumulative Entitlements

UVU based on Authorized User, UVU based on Employee User, and RVU based on Eligible Participant entitlements are not alternative means for licensing the Program. Licensee must obtain: (a) sufficient Authorized User UVU entitlements to cover any Licensee employee (which for the purpose of this paragraph includes any non-employee who is paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise) who is given access to the Program, or sufficient Employee User UVU entitlements to cover all employees whether or not they are given access to the Program; and (b) sufficient Eligible Participant RVU entitlements to cover any non-Employee Users of the Program. 


Program-unique Terms

A. Program Restrictions

1. Prohibited Components

Notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, Licensee is not authorized to use any of the following components or functions of the Program:

- Custom workflow creation (of FileNet Content Manager)

2. Restricted Uses

Licensed users of the Program may only access content stored in the Program's repository via the following products ("ICC Programs") with the exception of users who perform records management functions:

- IBM Content Collector for E-mail 
- IBM Content Collector for File Systems
- IBM Content Collector for Microsoft SharePoint
- IBM Content Collector for SAP Applications 
- IBM Content Collector for IBM Connections

The Program can only be used to manage content that is created by any of the ICC Programs.

In the event Licensee wishes to use the Program to manage content that is created via any other means, Licensee must contact an IBM Sales Representative or an IBM Business Partner to purchase a Trade Up license at the then current rates for such license.  

3. Components Used for Establishing Required Processor Value Unit (PVU) Entitlements

When determining the number of entitlements required for Licensee's installation or use of the Program, the installation or use of only the following Program components are taken into consideration. In other words, Licensee may install and use Program components other than those listed below, under the license terms, but only the listed components are used to determine the number of entitlements required for the Program.

Content Platform Engine


L/N:  L-NBAE-9KRN7Q
D/N:  L-NBAE-9KRN7Q
P/N:  L-NBAE-9KRN7Q 


==============================================


LICENSE INFORMATION

The Programs listed below are licensed under the following terms and conditions in addition to those of the IBM International Program License Agreement (IBM form number Z125-3301-14).

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Employee v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation 1000 External Pack v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation for Non-Production Environment v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On Employee v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On 1000 External Pack v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On V5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On for Non-Production Environment V5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Starter Pack Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On Starter Pack Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

As described in the International Program License Agreement ("IPLA") and this License Information, IBM grants Licensee a limited right to use the Program. This right is limited to the level of Authorized Use, such as a Processor Value Unit ("PVU"), a Value Unit ("VU"), or other specified level of use, paid for by Licensee as evidenced in the Proof of Entitlement. Licensee's use may also be limited to a specified machine, or only as a Supporting Program, or subject to other restrictions. As Licensee has not paid for all of the economic value of the Program, no other use is permitted without the payment of additional fees. In addition, as stated in the IPLA, Licensee is not authorized to use the Program to provide commercial IT services to any third party, to provide commercial hosting or timesharing, or to sublicense, rent, or lease the Program unless expressly provided for in the applicable agreements under which Licensee obtains authorizations to use the Program. Additional rights may be available to Licensee subject to the payment of additional fees or under different or supplementary terms. IBM reserves the right to determine whether to make such additional rights available to Licensee.

Program's specifications can be found in the collective Description and Technical Information sections of the Program's Announcement Letters.

Supporting Programs

The Program is licensed as a multi-product package and includes the Supporting Programs identified below. Licensee is authorized to install and use such Supporting Programs only to support Licensee's use of the Principal Program under this Agreement and within the limits of the Proofs of Entitlement for the Program (unless broader rights are provided elsewhere in this License Information document). The phrase "to support Licensee's use" would include only those uses that are necessary or otherwise directly related to a licensed use of the Principal Program or another Supporting Program. The Supporting Programs may not be used for any other purpose. Licensee is not authorized to transfer or remarket the Supporting Programs separate from the Principal Program. A Supporting Program may be accompanied by license terms, and those terms, if any, apply to Licensee's use of that Supporting Program. In the event of conflict, the terms in this License Information document supersede the Supporting Program's terms. When Licensee's right to use the Program expires or terminates, Licensee must discontinue use, destroy or promptly return all copies of the Supporting Programs to the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program. If Licensee downloaded the Supporting Programs, Licensee should contact the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program. If Licensee wishes to license the Supporting Programs for any use beyond the limits set forth above, please contact an IBM Sales Representative or the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program to obtain the appropriate license.

The following are Supporting Programs licensed with the Program:
IBM Content Foundation V5.2
IBM Retention Policy Syndication Framework V6.0.3
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence V10.2.1

Permitted Components

Notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, Licensee is permitted to use only the following components or functions of the identified Supporting Program:
onIBM Cognos Business Intelligence Reporting of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence
IBM Cognos Supporting Languages Documentation of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence Samples of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence

Non-Production Limitation

If the Program is designated as "Non-Production", the Program can only be deployed as part of the Licensee's internal development and test environment for internal non-production activities, including but not limited to testing, performance tuning, fault diagnosis, internal benchmarking, staging, quality assurance activity and/or developing internally used additions or extensions to the Program using published application programming interfaces. Licensee is not authorized to use any part of the Program for any other purposes without acquiring the appropriate production entitlements.

Source Components and Sample Materials

The Program may include some components in source code form ("Source Components") and other materials identified as Sample Materials. Licensee may copy and modify Source Components and Sample Materials for internal use only provided such use is within the limits of the license rights under this Agreement, provided however that Licensee may not alter or delete any copyright information or notices contained in the Source Components or Sample Materials. IBM provides the Source Components and Sample Materials without obligation of support and "AS IS", WITH NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING THE WARRANTY OF TITLE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OR NON-INTERFERENCE AND THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES AND CONDITIONS OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Restrictions on Use for the Benefit of a Third Party

Licensee may not use the Program or any component thereof to provide service bureau, hosting services, or any sort of commercial information technology services to third parties, or transfer the Program to a third party, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by IBM.

Processor Value Unit (PVU)

Processor Value Unit (PVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. The number of PVU entitlements required is based on the processor technology (defined within the PVU Table by Processor Vendor, Brand, Type and Model Number at http://www.ibm.com/software/lotus/passportadvantage/pvu_licensing_for_customers.html) and the number of processors made available to the Program. IBM continues to define a processor, for the purpose of PVU-based licensing, to be each processor core on a chip. A dual-core processor chip, for example, has two processor cores.

Licensee can deploy the Program using either Full Capacity licensing or Virtualization Capacity (Sub-Capacity) licensing according to the Passport Advantage Sub-Capacity Licensing Terms (see webpage below). If using Full Capacity licensing, Licensee must obtain PVU entitlements sufficient to cover all activated processor cores* in the physical hardware environment made available to or managed by the Program, except for those servers from which the Program has been permanently removed. If using Virtualization Capacity licensing, Licensee must obtain entitlements sufficient to cover all activated processor cores made available to or managed by the Program, as defined according to the Virtualization Capacity License Counting Rules at http://www.ibm.com/software/lotus/passportadvantage/Counting_Software_licenses_using_specific_virtualization_technologies.html.

* An Activated processor core is a processor core that is available for use in a physical or virtual server, regardless of whether the capacity of the processor core can be or is limited through virtualization technologies, operating system commands, BIOS settings, or similar restrictions.

Resource Value Unit (RVU)

Resource Value Unit (RVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. RVU Proofs of Entitlement are based on the number of units of a specific resource used or managed by the Program. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements for the number of RVUs required for Licensee's environment for the specific resources as specified in the table below. RVU entitlements are specific to the Program and the type of resource and may not be exchanged, interchanged, or aggregated with RVU entitlements of another program or resource.

User Value Unit (UVU)

User Value Unit (UVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. UVU Proofs of Entitlement are based on the number and type of Users for the given Program. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements for the number of UVUs required for Licensee's environment as specified in the table below. The UVU entitlements are specific to the Program and type of user and may not be exchanged, interchanged, or aggregated with UVU entitlements of another program or type of user.

General Charge Terms

1. User Value Unit Conversion Tables

Any individual whose content is declared as records or any individual who authors, accesses, retrieves, views, or reviews content that has been declared as records, regardless of when the records are declared is considered to have been given access to the Program and counts as a user.

a. User Value Unit Licensing based on Authorized Users and Add-On Authorized Users

i. The Users for the purposes of UVU calculation are Authorized Users. An Authorized User is a unique person who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. An entitlement for an Authorized User is unique to that Authorized User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person.

Any computing device that requests the execution of or receives for execution a set of commands, procedures, or applications from the Program or that is otherwise managed by the Program is considered a separate User of the Program and requires an entitlement as if that device were a person.

From 1 to 20 Users, 1.00 UVU per User
From 21 to 50 Users, 20 UVUs plus 0.83 UVUs per User above 20 
From 51 to 100 Users, 44.9 UVUs plus 0.80 UVUs per User above 50
From 101 to 250 Users, 84.9 UVUs plus 0.76 UVUs per User above 100 
From 251 to 500 Users, 198.9 UVUs plus 0.60 UVUs per User above 250 
From 501 to 1,000 Users, 348.9 UVUs plus 0.50 UVUs per User above 500 
From 1,001 to 5,000 Users, 598.9 UVUs plus 0.47 UVUs per User above 1,000 
From 5,001 to 10,000 Users, 2,478.9 UVUs plus 0.40 UVUs per User above 5,000 
From 10,001 to 25,000 Users, 4,478.9 UVUs plus 0.36 UVUs per User above 10,000 
For more than 25,000 Users, 9,878.9 UVUs plus 0.33 UVUs per User above 25,000 

ii. Infrequent User

"Infrequent User" means an Authorized User who accesses the Program not more than one hundred twenty (120) times in any consecutive 12 month period. A single access is comprised of one or more interactions between the Authorized User and the Program or actions performed on behalf of the Authorized User by the Program, all within a consecutive 15 minute period. 

For the specific Programs listed below, on the condition that Licensee creates a mechanism to track accesses by Authorized Users to verify that they meet the requirements of Infrequent Users, Infrequent Users need not be counted as full Authorized Users. A ratio of ten (10) Infrequent Users will equal one (1) Authorized User for the purpose of calculating Authorized UVUs. Programs eligible to use the Infrequent User ratio in calculating required Authorized UVUs are:

- IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Authorized
- IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On Authorized
- IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Starter Pack Authorized
- IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On Starter Pack Authorized

Licensee agrees to provide to IBM and its auditors details of the tracking mechanism described above, upon request.
 
b. User Value Unit Licensing based on Employee Users and Add-On Employee Users

The Users for the purpose of UVU calculation are Employee Users. An Employee User is a unique person employed in Licensee's Enterprise, whether or not given access to the Program, or a unique person otherwise paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. An entitlement for an Employee User is unique to that Employee User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person. 

Licensee must acquire sufficient UVU entitlements to cover all employees and any other unique persons paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise.

From 1,000 to 2,500 Users, 1.00 UVU per User
From 2,501 to 5,000 Users, 2,500 UVUs plus 0.80 UVUs per User above 2,500 
From 5,001 to 10,000 Users, 4,500 UVUs plus 0.70 UVUs per User above 5,000 
From 10,001 to 30,000 Users, 8,000 UVUs plus 0.65 UVUs per User above 10,000
From 30,001 to 50,000 Users, 21,000 UVUs plus 0.55 UVUs per User above 30,000
From 50,001 to 100,000 Users, 32,000 UVUs plus 0.50 UVUs per User above 50,000
From 100,001 to 300,000 Users, 57,000 UVUs plus 0.46 UVUs per User above 100,000
From 300,001 to 500,000 Users, 149,000 UVUs plus 0.40 UVUs per User above 300,000
From 500,001 to 1,000,000 Users, 229,000 UVUs plus 0.36 UVUs per User above 500,000
For more than 1,000,000 Users, 409,000 UVUs plus 0.32 UVUs per User above 1,000,000 

2. Unit Licensing User Value Unit Licensing based on 1000 External Pack and Add-On 1000 External Pack

A User Pack for the purposes of UVU calculation is one thousand External Users (1000 External Pack). An External User is a unique person, not employed in, paid by, or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise, who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. A person who is employed in or paid by Licensee's Enterprise, but not accessing the Program within the scope of that relationship may be an External User. An entitlement for an External User is unique to that External User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person. 

From 1 to 10 User Packs, 1.00 UVU per User Pack
From 11 to 50 User Packs, 10.0 UVUs plus 0.87 UVUs per User Pack above 10
From 51 to 100 User Packs, 44.8 UVUs plus 0.60 UVUs per User Pack above 50
From 101 to 500 User Packs, 74.8 UVUs plus 0.25 UVUs per User Pack above 100 
From 501 to 1,000 User Packs, 174.8.0 UVUs plus 0.20 UVUs per User Pack above 500
From 1,001 to 10,000 User Packs, 274.8 UVUs plus 0.07 UVUs per User Pack above 1,000
From 10,001 to 25,000 User Packs, 904.8 UVUs plus 0.04 UVUs per User Pack above 10,000
From 25,001 User Packs to 50,000 User Packs, 1,504.8 UVUs plus 0.03 UVUs per User Pack above 25,000
From 50,001 User Packs to 100,000 User Packs, 2,254.8 UVUs plus 0.02 UVUs per User Pack above 50,000
For more than 100,000 User Packs, 3,254.8 UVUs plus 0.01 UVUs per User Pack above 100,000

Cumulative Entitlements

UVU based on Authorized User, UVU based on Employee User, and UVU based on 1000 External Pack entitlements are not alternative means for licensing the Program. Licensee must obtain: (a) sufficient Authorized User UVU entitlements to cover any Licensee employee (which for the purpose of this paragraph includes any non-employee who is paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise) who is given access to the Program, or sufficient Employee User UVU entitlements to cover all employees whether or not they are given access to the Program; and (b) sufficient 1000 External Pack entitlements to cover any non-Employee Users of the Program. 


Program-unique Terms

1. Supporting Program Details

IBM Content Foundation

Use Limitations: Unrestricted for any entitlement not identified as "Add-On" 

"Unrestricted" means that, notwithstanding the language above, Licensee's right to use the Supporting Program is not limited to use only in support of Licensee's use of the Principal Program. While the other restrictions on Licensee's use of the Supporting Program continue to apply, Licensee may use the Supporting Program for purposes independent of the licensed use of the Principal Program.

2. Permitted Components

For any Program designated as "Add-On", except for when Licensee is applying the "Add-On" to IBM Content Foundation, notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, Licensee is permitted to use only the following components or functions of the identified Supporting Program:

- Content Federation Services Capability (of IBM Content Foundation)

3. Prohibited Components

Notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, for any Program not designated as "Add-On", Licensee is not authorized to use any of the following components or functions of the Program:

- Custom workflow creation (of IBM Content Foundation)

4. Starter Pack Program Restrictions

a. For any Program acquired by Licensee identified as "Starter Pack", Licensee may not use the Program to connect to any other instance or deployment of the Program.

b. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, use of any Program designated as "Starter Pack" may not exceed fourteen hundred (1,400) Authorized Users per instance.

5. Components Used for Establishing Required Processor Value Unit (PVU) Entitlements

When determining the number of entitlements required for Licensee's installation or use of the Program, the installation or use of only the following Program components are taken into consideration. In other words, Licensee may install and use Program components other than those listed below, under the license terms, but only the listed components are used to determine the number of entitlements required for the Program.

Content Platform Engine


L/N:  L-NBAE-9LDRBP
D/N:  L-NBAE-9LDRBP
P/N:  L-NBAE-9LDRBP 


==============================================


LICENSE INFORMATION

The Programs listed below are licensed under the following terms and conditions in addition to those of the IBM International Program License Agreement (IBM form number Z125-3301-14).

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Content Collector Edition Authorized v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Content Collector Edition Employee v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Content Collector Edition 1000 External Pack v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Content Collector Edition v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

Program Name: IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Content Collector Edition for Non-Production Environment v5.2.1.6
Program Number: 5724-S19

As described in the International Program License Agreement ("IPLA") and this License Information, IBM grants Licensee a limited right to use the Program. This right is limited to the level of Authorized Use, such as a Processor Value Unit ("PVU"), a Value Unit ("VU"), or other specified level of use, paid for by Licensee as evidenced in the Proof of Entitlement. Licensee's use may also be limited to a specified machine, or only as a Supporting Program, or subject to other restrictions. As Licensee has not paid for all of the economic value of the Program, no other use is permitted without the payment of additional fees. In addition, as stated in the IPLA, Licensee is not authorized to use the Program to provide commercial IT services to any third party, to provide commercial hosting or timesharing, or to sublicense, rent, or lease the Program unless expressly provided for in the applicable agreements under which Licensee obtains authorizations to use the Program. Additional rights may be available to Licensee subject to the payment of additional fees or under different or supplementary terms. IBM reserves the right to determine whether to make such additional rights available to Licensee.

Program's specifications can be found in the collective Description and Technical Information sections of the Program's Announcement Letters.

Supporting Programs

The Program is licensed as a multi-product package and includes the Supporting Programs identified below. Licensee is authorized to install and use such Supporting Programs only to support Licensee's use of the Principal Program under this Agreement and within the limits of the Proofs of Entitlement for the Program (unless broader rights are provided elsewhere in this License Information document). The phrase "to support Licensee's use" would include only those uses that are necessary or otherwise directly related to a licensed use of the Principal Program or another Supporting Program. The Supporting Programs may not be used for any other purpose. Licensee is not authorized to transfer or remarket the Supporting Programs separate from the Principal Program. A Supporting Program may be accompanied by license terms, and those terms, if any, apply to Licensee's use of that Supporting Program. In the event of conflict, the terms in this License Information document supersede the Supporting Program's terms. When Licensee's right to use the Program expires or terminates, Licensee must discontinue use, destroy or promptly return all copies of the Supporting Programs to the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program. If Licensee downloaded the Supporting Programs, Licensee should contact the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program. If Licensee wishes to license the Supporting Programs for any use beyond the limits set forth above, please contact an IBM Sales Representative or the party from whom Licensee acquired the Program to obtain the appropriate license.

The following are Supporting Programs licensed with the Program:
IBM Content Foundation V5.2
IBM Retention Policy Syndication Framework V6.0.3
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence V10.2.1

Permitted Components

Notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, Licensee is permitted to use only the following components or functions of the identified Supporting Program:
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence Reporting of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence
IBM Cognos Supporting Languages Documentation of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence
IBM Cognos Business Intelligence Samples of IBM Cognos Business Intelligence

Non-Production Limitation

If the Program is designated as "Non-Production", the Program can only be deployed as part of the Licensee's internal development and test environment for internal non-production activities, including but not limited to testing, performance tuning, fault diagnosis, internal benchmarking, staging, quality assurance activity and/or developing internally used additions or extensions to the Program using published application programming interfaces. Licensee is not authorized to use any part of the Program for any other purposes without acquiring the appropriate production entitlements.

Source Components and Sample Materials

The Program may include some components in source code form ("Source Components") and other materials identified as Sample Materials. Licensee may copy and modify Source Components and Sample Materials for internal use only provided such use is within the limits of the license rights under this Agreement, provided however that Licensee may not alter or delete any copyright information or notices contained in the Source Components or Sample Materials. IBM provides the Source Components and Sample Materials without obligation of support and "AS IS", WITH NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING THE WARRANTY OF TITLE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OR NON-INTERFERENCE AND THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES AND CONDITIONS OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Restrictions on Use for the Benefit of a Third Party

Licensee may not use the Program or any component thereof to provide service bureau, hosting services, or any sort of commercial information technology services to third parties, or transfer the Program to a third party, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by IBM.

Processor Value Unit (PVU)

Processor Value Unit (PVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. The number of PVU entitlements required is based on the processor technology (defined within the PVU Table by Processor Vendor, Brand, Type and Model Number at http://www.ibm.com/software/lotus/passportadvantage/pvu_licensing_for_customers.html) and the number of processors made available to the Program. IBM continues to define a processor, for the purpose of PVU-based licensing, to be each processor core on a chip. A dual-core processor chip, for example, has two processor cores.

Licensee can deploy the Program using either Full Capacity licensing or Virtualization Capacity (Sub-Capacity) licensing according to the Passport Advantage Sub-Capacity Licensing Terms (see webpage below). If using Full Capacity licensing, Licensee must obtain PVU entitlements sufficient to cover all activated processor cores* in the physical hardware environment made available to or managed by the Program, except for those servers from which the Program has been permanently removed. If using Virtualization Capacity licensing, Licensee must obtain entitlements sufficient to cover all activated processor cores made available to or managed by the Program, as defined according to the Virtualization Capacity License Counting Rules at http://www.ibm.com/software/lotus/passportadvantage/Counting_Software_licenses_using_specific_virtualization_technologies.html.

* An Activated processor core is a processor core that is available for use in a physical or virtual server, regardless of whether the capacity of the processor core can be or is limited through virtualization technologies, operating system commands, BIOS settings, or similar restrictions.

Resource Value Unit (RVU)

Resource Value Unit (RVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. RVU Proofs of Entitlement are based on the number of units of a specific resource used or managed by the Program. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements for the number of RVUs required for Licensee's environment for the specific resources as specified in the table below. RVU entitlements are specific to the Program and the type of resource and may not be exchanged, interchanged, or aggregated with RVU entitlements of another program or resource.

User Value Unit (UVU)

User Value Unit (UVU) is a unit of measure by which the Program can be licensed. UVU Proofs of Entitlement are based on the number and type of Users for the given Program. Licensee must obtain sufficient entitlements for the number of UVUs required for Licensee's environment as specified in the table below. The UVU entitlements are specific to the Program and type of user and may not be exchanged, interchanged, or aggregated with UVU entitlements of another program or type of user.

General Charge Terms

User Value Unit Conversion Tables

Any individual whose content is declared as records or any individual who authors, accesses, retrieves, views, or reviews content that has been declared as records, regardless of when the records are declared is considered to have been given access to the Program and counts as a user.

a. User Value Unit Licensing based on Authorized Users and Add-On Authorized Users

i. The Users for the purposes of UVU calculation are Authorized Users. An Authorized User is a unique person who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. An entitlement for an Authorized User is unique to that Authorized User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person.

Any computing device that requests the execution of or receives for execution a set of commands, procedures, or applications from the Program or that is otherwise managed by the Program is considered a separate User of the Program and requires an entitlement as if that device were a person.

From 1 to 20 Users, 1.00 UVU per User
From 21 to 50 Users, 20 UVUs plus 0.83 UVUs per User above 20 
From 51 to 100 Users, 44.9 UVUs plus 0.80 UVUs per User above 50
From 101 to 250 Users, 84.9 UVUs plus 0.76 UVUs per User above 100 
From 251 to 500 Users, 198.9 UVUs plus 0.60 UVUs per User above 250 
From 501 to 1,000 Users, 348.9 UVUs plus 0.50 UVUs per User above 500 
From 1,001 to 5,000 Users, 598.9 UVUs plus 0.47 UVUs per User above 1,000 
From 5,001 to 10,000 Users, 2,478.9 UVUs plus 0.40 UVUs per User above 5,000 
From 10,001 to 25,000 Users, 4,478.9 UVUs plus 0.36 UVUs per User above 10,000 
For more than 25,000 Users, 9,878.9 UVUs plus 0.33 UVUs per User above 25,000 

ii. Infrequent User

"Infrequent User" means an Authorized User who accesses the Program not more than one hundred twenty (120) times in any consecutive 12 month period. A single access is comprised of one or more interactions between the Authorized User and the Program or actions performed on behalf of the Authorized User by the Program, all within a consecutive 15 minute period. 

For the specific Programs listed below, on the condition that Licensee creates a mechanism to track accesses by Authorized Users to verify that they meet the requirements of Infrequent Users, Infrequent Users need not be counted as full Authorized Users. A ratio of ten (10) Infrequent Users will equal one (1) Authorized User for the purpose of calculating Authorized UVUs. Programs eligible to use the Infrequent User ratio in calculating required Authorized UVUs are:

- IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Authorized
- IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On Authorized
- IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Starter Pack Authorized
- IBM Enterprise Records Foundation Add-On Starter Pack Authorized

Licensee agrees to provide to IBM and its auditors details of the tracking mechanism described above, upon request.
 
b. User Value Unit Licensing based on Employee Users and Add-On Employee Users

The Users for the purpose of UVU calculation are Employee Users. An Employee User is a unique person employed in Licensee's Enterprise, whether or not given access to the Program, or a unique person otherwise paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. An entitlement for an Employee User is unique to that Employee User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person. 

Licensee must acquire sufficient UVU entitlements to cover all employees and any other unique persons paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise.

From 1,000 to 2,500 Users, 1.00 UVU per User
From 2,501 to 5,000 Users, 2,500 UVUs plus 0.80 UVUs per User above 2,500 
From 5,001 to 10,000 Users, 4,500 UVUs plus 0.70 UVUs per User above 5,000 
From 10,001 to 30,000 Users, 8,000 UVUs plus 0.65 UVUs per User above 10,000
From 30,001 to 50,000 Users, 21,000 UVUs plus 0.55 UVUs per User above 30,000
From 50,001 to 100,000 Users, 32,000 UVUs plus 0.50 UVUs per User above 50,000
From 100,001 to 300,000 Users, 57,000 UVUs plus 0.46 UVUs per User above 100,000
From 300,001 to 500,000 Users, 149,000 UVUs plus 0.40 UVUs per User above 300,000
From 500,001 to 1,000,000 Users, 229,000 UVUs plus 0.36 UVUs per User above 500,000
For more than 1,000,000 Users, 409,000 UVUs plus 0.32 UVUs per User above 1,000,000 

2c. User Value Unit Licensing based on 1000 External Pack and Add-On 1000 External Pack

A User Pack for the purposes of UVU calculation is one thousand External Users (1000 External Pack). An External User is a unique person, not employed in, paid by, or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise, who is given access to the Program in any manner directly or indirectly (for example: via a multiplexing program, device, or application server) through any means. A person who is employed in or paid by Licensee's Enterprise, but not accessing the Program within the scope of that relationship may be an External User. An entitlement for an External User is unique to that External User and may not be shared, nor may it be reassigned other than for the permanent transfer of the entitlement to another person. 

From 1 to 10 User Packs, 1.00 UVU per User Pack
From 11 to 50 User Packs, 10.0 UVUs plus 0.87 UVUs per User Pack above 10
From 51 to 100 User Packs, 44.8 UVUs plus 0.60 UVUs per User Pack above 50
From 101 to 500 User Packs, 74.8 UVUs plus 0.25 UVUs per User Pack above 100 
From 501 to 1,000 User Packs, 174.8.0 UVUs plus 0.20 UVUs per User Pack above 500
From 1,001 to 10,000 User Packs, 274.8 UVUs plus 0.07 UVUs per User Pack above 1,000
From 10,001 to 25,000 User Packs, 904.8 UVUs plus 0.04 UVUs per User Pack above 10,000
From 25,001 User Packs to 50,000 User Packs, 1,504.8 UVUs plus 0.03 UVUs per User Pack above 25,000
From 50,001 User Packs to 100,000 User Packs, 2,254.8 UVUs plus 0.02 UVUs per User Pack above 50,000
For more than 100,000 User Packs, 3,254.8 UVUs plus 0.01 UVUs per User Pack above 100,000

Cumulative Entitlements

UVU based on Authorized User, UVU based on Employee User, and UVU based on 1000 External Pack entitlements are not alternative means for licensing the Program. Licensee must obtain: (a) sufficient Authorized User UVU entitlements to cover any Licensee employee (which for the purpose of this paragraph includes any non-employee who is paid by or acting on behalf of Licensee's Enterprise) who is given access to the Program, or sufficient Employee User UVU entitlements to cover all employees whether or not they are given access to the Program; and (b) sufficient 1000 External Pack entitlements to cover any non-Employee Users of the Program. 


Program-unique Terms

A. Program Restrictions

1. Prohibited Components

Notwithstanding any provision in the Agreement, Licensee is not authorized to use any of the following components or functions of the Program:

- Custom workflow creation (of IBM Content Foundation)

2. Restricted Uses

Licensed users of the Program may only access content stored in the Program's repository via the following products ("ICC Programs") with the exception of users who perform records management functions:

- IBM Content Collector for E-mail 
- IBM Content Collector for File Systems
- IBM Content Collector for Microsoft SharePoint
- IBM Content Collector for SAP Applications 
- IBM Content Collector for IBM Connections

The Program can only be used to manage content that is created by any of the ICC Programs.

In the event Licensee wishes to use the Program to manage content that is created via any other means, Licensee must contact an IBM Sales Representative or an IBM Business Partner to purchase a Trade Up license at the then current rates for such license.  

3. Components Used for Establishing Required Processor Value Unit (PVU) Entitlements

When determining the number of entitlements required for Licensee's installation or use of the Program, the installation or use of only the following Program components are taken into consideration. In other words, Licensee may install and use Program components other than those listed below, under the license terms, but only the listed components are used to determine the number of entitlements required for the Program.

Content Platform Engine


L/N:  L-NBAE-9LZNC7
D/N:  L-NBAE-9LZNC7
P/N:  L-NBAE-9LZNC7 
